It's called Qi Pu Lu and is rather famous within locals, where they also sell wholesale.
-Lower blood pressure.
Shame on you Mr. Burton !!!
In On Writing, Stephen King says that with strong word choices and a firm grasp of what’s important for the reader to see, a writer can, indeed, convey their point, message, beauty, horror, whatever really, with just a few words.
They can't. Feminism has deceived them
But I'm getting better.
You can even revive an old post. It may be old news to you but there are so many new blogs coming online every day that it is NEW to them. So come along link up and check out the other submissions and remember is all about just sharing the creativity and you may even find yourself making some new blog buddies.
1. Long term loans usually come with a new vehicle purchase only. They can run form 36 months to 60 months repayment time. The monthly payment for these is smaller but you will definitely pay more in interest as the time of the loan goes up. Lon term loans do not take into consideration the depreciation of the vehicle and you will be paying for something not worth the remaining loan balance.
uncle told me Kirkegaard was so difficult for Grandpa to read in English, that he tracked
And if you believe all that, let me also tell you that everyone who stops by my blog today wins free airfare and a week’s vacation to Costa Rica, all expenses paid.
In particular, he argues that you can't say that specific elements of "Arab culture" account for the deficit because it's present in non-Arab countries as well. But you also can't say that specific elements of "Muslim culture" account for the deficit because it's not present in Muslim-majority countries that weren't part of the original Arab conquest:
I’m grateful for my home, but I am most grateful for the two souls that I share it with – they are the true source of my happiness.
So what do you guys think about our new vanity area? Do you like the dark color, and how it compliments the light color of the master bathroom, or is it too dark for you?
IP: I now recycle so much that my standard green bin is half empty when the van comes. Recycling done at home means multiple vehicle visits. There has to be a cost-benefit analysis. We already have fortnightly collections for all sorts of things.
It didn’t matter the question, Angelo was a yes-dog. Maybe that was the reason he and Malcolm became friends so quickly. Or maybe it was Angelo’s enormous heart, but more about that later.
Universal Music Publishing / Farrell Music Ltd
Our younger daughter came around with some tender pork cutlets
As such, the obvious conclusion has been reached: there are good reasons to enforce obedience and good reason to allow disobedience. The challenge would seem to be to balance the need for both obedience and dissent in a way that creates the most good (and avoids the most evil).
Furthermore, while the Parliamentary Secretary is talking to the Chairman of I.T.V. he might speak to him about smoking by performers in non-commercial programmes. I do not watch the commercial screen very frequently, but I am told by those who do that in almost any type of programme, and particularly the so-called serious political discussions, some and often all of the participants are constantly puffing away at cigarettes and offering themselves a further supply.
I decided that it would be much more useful and had enjoyed it when I borrowed it from the library a few months ago.
We aim to provide a high level of customer service and are on hand to offer purchasing suggestions, fitting advice or ideas for gentleman buying gifts, to ensure your on-line shopping experience is as pleasant and simple as possible.
I would still rcommend this beer to anyone, but I would recommend every beer for everyone. It's all a taste preference, mine is no better than yours or the next guy. Last spring, my friend Trevor and I, did a beer tasting / tournament for some co-workers. We did the tasting around the NCAA tournament so we did 8 different styles and had one on one tastings with a vote and the round "winner" would move on towards the champion of beers! The beer that ended up winning was a beer style that I don't like at all, but I kept making the point that taste preference was personal. I guess the only difference is that I have tried more, so I know a little more easily what I like and dislike.
The dubious offers of sexual liasons may or may not reappear, but I will not give a fuck - been there, done that.
Obtaining a certificate or degree in environmental sciences can help you to build your skills and knowledge to pursue the career you desire.
By the way, a very nice person in contact with schools in Australia, told me that she knows several classes who enjoy this blog, but that they aren't able to comment because of school internet policy. I quite understand and I just love the idea that you're out there reading this. So, helloooooo!
Here are some photos to give you a sense of this special place:
When McDonalds, came on the scene, I can remember the first time my family visited one. My dad was pretty skeptical. “Fast food?” he asked? “Why would anyone want fast food? . . . I’d prefer that mine was good food.” That’s how I suspect many people viewed restaurants before Ray Kroc.
CAS lends durable medical equipment to San Gabriel Valley residents, saving money for individuals, hospitals and insurance companies, helping people who couldn’t otherwise afford the proper medical equipment, and keeping unused medical equipment out of landfills. In addition to their important mission, the staff and volunteers are wonderful to work with, creating a rewarding volunteer experience for the JRP pro bono consultants placed at CAS. Thanks to Mimi, Gay and Warry for their volunteer time, and to Dan and Jesse for being great to work with!
1997, you know back before we were really worried about Y2K, maybe even before we ever heard of it? We were still speculating what it would be like to "party like it's 1999" - for the record it was a little over inflated and my view of that may have been due to it being a particularly crappy year personally. My my my, how things have changed since then!
until they land confidently on their destined perch, gently settling with a soft flutter of their newly found wings.
With a population of 140, its unspoilt qualities make it a frequent setting for period films, set in the 18th century, such as those based on the novels of Catherine Cookson.
I'm a little concerned about this part. It came with the loom, but I don't know what it is or where it goes. It is the same length as the reeds, so I suspect it has something to do with them, but it is not obvious to me what it is for.
"Then do it, goddammit," Sonny snapped, though Jared was right. Sonny hadn't followed the plan. He hurried across the room, best as he could on his toeless feet, and was right behind Ray as they reached the curtained door.
All characters, good or bad, must have that one driving force that compels them to act, think, and feel the way that they do. Every character has a back story, events that happened in his/her lifetime that shape who they become and how they perceive the world around them. Those events also help to create what drives them and how far they'll go to reach their intended goal.
3 tbsp melted butter
Your friend is not entitled to court-appointed counsel, but she will be given a list of local legal services providers at her first court hearing. An attorney can give your friend advice and determine the best course of action. There may be relief available to your friend, depending on her immigration and criminal history, ability to demonstrate a good moral character, and whether she has any qualifying US citizen relatives. This is a discretionary form of relief, and something she should not pursue on her own.
4) There can never be national unity if a single ethnic group can own the biggest share of the nation’s wealth . . .
The following diagram shows the results when simulating five days elapsed time. Based on the quantity of materials purchased 3840 units were created in 98hrs. This matches the build time in EVE validating the model.
16. Fluffy 14:20
However, time moves forward, not back and times have changed; everything has changed and not, unfortunately, for the best.
However Deputy Prime Minister Nick Clegg indicated he would curb the plans. I wonder how they'll define exceptional, could it be government speak for almost all? The reaction of Nick Clegg is fairly typical too, if there's a way to be out of touch with public opinion, the Lib Dems normally manage to find it.
Retailers abhorrence agenda administration too. No one makes money on accouterments sales. The accumulation is in games, abnormally acclimated games. Some retailers are already abnegation to banal the PSP Go because of its absurd bulk and download abandoned bold distribution. If the bold industry wants to about-face to agenda distribution, they're traveling to accept to alpha affairs consoles to retailers at an even greater accident than they do now so the accouterments profits for the retailers will achieve up for the abridgement of actual software sales.
The second post will examine the Yom Kippur festival in detail, in its textual, cultural, and social context.
There are many more photos from 2D 2011 at the following Facebook pages -
In this edition of Writing Wednesday (which is not technically a thing, just convenient as it's a Wednesday and I've been writing), I'm going to give you an excerpt of a story I am writing entitled There's No Such Thing As Gravity, title courtesy of my brother James. This is the first creative writing I've done in about a year and I'm pretty excited about it. Let me know what you think in the comments. Or don't. Whatever.
So, let us return to the question – do they belong on here?
This is a sticky posting and will stay at the top until the 17th October when this ends. To find out how to win click here.
Everyone has their own weird fashion quirks and one of mine is that I really like pants that have zippers on the side. I had a grey pair of skinny jeans with ankle zippers that I wore practically every day of grad school and I thought I was such hot shiz. Like a modern day, female, less-grungy-but-still-hot Kurt Cobain.
This is real life.
-- While climbing into the bath, Jonah tactfully observes, "Mom. I smell like poop."
Do you have a favorite holiday cookie?
Obviously, I felt it was imperative that I approach this analysis with sternly scientific eye and to that end, I've tested almost all the writing I have ever done, not just few paragraphs here and there but the entire stories. Before I continue, let me just reassure you - this test is purely for fun and cannot in any way be taken seriously, the computers are nuance-free and while they may tell you that your writing appears to sound like James Joyce (whom I repeatedly got to my utter dismay and discomfort), believe me when I tell you that it most definitely doesn't. But I am nothing if not thorough (complete lie) and I had to investigate this new toy as extensively as time and prolonged proximity to LCD screen would allow.
With the splendid weather and great food, we felt optimistic about our prospect for success. And we were - almost doubling the result of last years fund-raiser. Though, beyond the money raised (and that sure is important), participating members were rewarded with the satisfaction that comes from teamwork and camaraderie. One of the great thing about events like the fund-raiser, is that it gathers members together, spurring informal get-to-know-you sessions.
By 1993 the ANC was able to dominate the negotiating process, as well as to control the (undefeated) South African police and army and bend them to its will. By mid-1994 it had trounced its rivals and taken over government.
Here are the fabulous Design Team creations for this week! Hope they inspire you to have a play yourselves. Do pay them all a visit and let them know what you think!
The IPKat isn’t used to all this economic-style analysis dictating the direction of cases and he’s not sure how good it is for the predictability of the law (although in this case he wonders if the Supreme Court’s legal framework that it put in place here might well have stood up without it). By focusing on secondary infringement based on an intent to induce infringement, the Supreme Court has neatly side-stepped the issue of the limits of the rule that there is no secondary infringement where the method for infringement also has a legitimate use. In particular, the court has avoided answering the question of what percentage of the use has to be legitimate in order for a product to avoid being seen as a tool of secondary infringement.
The month of October I get to write about Fall and all the goodness that comes with this glorious season!
Yes, I have high blood pressure. But my foxy doctor put me on meds, and tomorrow I'm going for the stress-test/echocardiogram. Plus, I'll get to learn the results of my blood test where they did all the triglycerides/cholesteral stuff. Today while at the dentist, they took my blood pressure, and it was darn near normal (136/70), so yay for that. I will say that since going on the meds, I haven't felt the heart palpitations I used to feel at least a couple of times a day. Sometimes these "flutters" would lead to full on anxiety attacks because of the freaky inner dialogue that would go on when they would happen (Stuff like: "Holy shit! I'm stroking out!), so it's nice that they've gone away.
WFCR e-pledge day is June 1st. Public radio is wonderful.
Dry Dock Brewing Co. Maple Bacon ESB
What is funny to some but pisses me off, is that I have lost 15-20 pounds of muscle mass since May of 2007. I have people at work that say I would do anything to lose that much weight. I want to tell them that if they get off their fat ass and stop shoveling food in that pie hole they call a mouth, they probably could lose weight. Also a little exercise will help. Keep on sticking those placebos you call diet pills down your throat and keep praying to shed those pounds. It’s not going to work fat ass.
Freeway opponents began a new push to remove the freeway rather than repairing it, and they succeeded now that freeway backers could no longer say that the traffic displaced from the freeway would create gridlock on local streets. Herb Caen changed his position and supported removing the freeway rather than repairing it. The main opponents were Chinatown merchants, who claimed that their business declined by 15 to 40 percent after the earthquake.
* Works on boats, RV’s and trucks (military & industrial applications)
A couple of days ago I put this picture on my Facebook:
Her response was, "Yes". (However she was still in her highchair, her hands were filthy, and there was no napkin in sight.
This time it worked.
Revlon Colorstay Under Eye Concealer SPF15, “Light”- Under the eye (purchased from Suvarnabhumi Airport, Bangkok, Thailand, Revlon USA)
Don't you agree? I mean come on, how yummy do those look? Actually I think everything is better covered in sugar, but then someone would bring up some random food that of course doesn't taste good with sugar...or anything for that matter. Just like how my husband believes that everything taste better with ranch...except ice cream. Speaking of ranch, its my goal to make my own this year...from scratch....we go through enough of it. And ketchup, my middle boy LOVES ketchup...actually he just loves all condiments. Pretty much anything that he can dip his food into.
We can go toe to toe cuz I stay an infidel.
Because this is my what if…..
C. growth of lawlessness in California.
You lost your kids to CPS
To celebrate Halloween and preserve my fondly held memories of the original 1966-’71 ABC TV series in the time before the Burton-Depp big screen reworking of the show comes out (and is either an absolute joy or a big-budget embarrassment), I hereby present an appreciation of the gothic soap opera Dark Shadows. The series scared the hell out of me as a child, but I still collected the trading cards, the comic books, and even the daily cartoon strips. As a young adult I was able to consume ample amounts of the show in reruns and found that it was both a really terrific horror TV show and a delightful piece of Sixties camp (that decade, as I note frequently on the Funhouse TV show, is the “gift that keeps on giving, and giving, and…”).
Thank you all in advance, because I know how bloggers are, and know the outpouring of love you give to those who need it. Please pray.
the fifth verse, primordial oohs
Makes me tired. I also seem to caught Eli and Emmy's cold so I'm not feeling very well.
It was an early morning of August 6th, a sharp ringing woke me up; I stumbled for the phone on my nightstand.
Ok, I need some tooth advice (although is Lex destined for braces with a tooth growing in behind or does it move on its own or?...): Mister Man has his very first loose tooth. How long before it comes out? What do I do to ummm encourage him? How long before the next tooth comes in to replace it?
The pleasing combination of digestive biscuit base, cheese cake and jello is extremely easy to make-if there was ever a Cheesecake for Dummies, this would easily qualify as one. The only thing that one needs to focus on is to make it look pretty... which wasn't difficult until I started slicing it.
Once I had heard from Laura that we could wrap everything up, I thanked everyone for allowing us access to their home, and I then set off towards Birmingham. One thing I won’t forget heading back was the amount of fog when passing through Oxfordshire. Before I forget to mention, I need to dedicate part of this post to Laura, who was great in making sure I was alright during my time out on location, leaving Surrey and getting back to my hotel, safely. I made it back 12.30am and wasn’t even tired from driving there and back. When I am next in the studio, touch wood, I will ask Jonathan how he got on on his location if and when I am asked to go back to Maverick. So I am happy in the knowledge that I can drive to locations by myself, and I hope I get to do more of this cool stuff. Although I had a few wobbly moments getting there, I felt better after getting tonnes of support from Maverick and the person I headed down to see.
Quantum jumping where diagonals interspace
I re-read The Secret Circle series hurriedly in preparation for the new Tv show on the CW. I really liked the series, although there were some things I wasn't too keen about: the dialogue, the cheesy one-liners. It was funny reading it now as an adult (I read it back in the 6th grade), seeing all that has changed- style, character names, lack of cell phones, etc (the books were written in the early 90s).
So why do new fathers need "religion?" Here's why... You need a little bit of religion to innoculate your respective Life Force Suckers early on in their little life force sucking lives. Otherwise, you risk them going off and "finding" religion themselves... But if you forcefeed them some GOD early on, then they'll see how shamtastic religion is, and they'll develop the antibodies to defeat any and all would-be messiahs or prostylatizers.
Yeah you gotta believe, you gotta believe
1. Transparency – Companies now have the ability to be more open than ever and connect with customers in mere seconds. It can also function in a reverse manner, with individuals being able to communicate with companies online, aside from the barriers of an organizational hierarchy. For the most part, prospective customers want to feel as though companies have the utmost credibility and conduct business in an honest fashion. With this in mind, social media can be an avenue to accomplish this, by opening the gates of communication to any individual that would like to correspond directly with the company.
the musical clank,
I really, really miss my subscription to Entertainment Weekly.
10 Tips To Maximizing Sale Of Your Home
- Questioning whether a person at the Bureau of Statistics can compile statistics on life expectancy and get a patent (Kennedy)
Thanks ever so much – we really do appreciate it xxx
Oh, and I got my new couch! (But not my new orange armchair. In a few weeks, they say.) And, I got a new coffee table and end table, too. Here they are, with far too many animals:
I didn't have this one. In fact, the last time I saw it, the four photos had been cut into mini cards by yours truly as an 11-year-old.
- 2 tbsp olive oil or lard
Don't get me wrong, they had Iphones & fancy flat screen tvs in the movie,
February 15th is the average last frost date for Houston. This means that there are many summer vegetable seeds we can start in February, but please first read our words of caution about "average" last frost dates. You will need to be prepared to protect your seedlings from an unseasonable frost which means using insulators or covers, or keeping your seedlings in pots so they can be brought inside if necessary.
Other stuff used is ~
E:going to school
So, this holiday fourth of July weekend, or whatever the case may be where you are, take a moment to NOTICE just where you are Right Now, and then, take just a glance backwards to remember how excited you were when This Thing Happened—that first glow, that first happy realization that you met your goal before you left it behind and began the round and round and round.
12. Time Remembered
I cautiously opened the second plain loaf and I was witness to a smell I can only explain as the fishy smell you get from Shiraki noodles before you rinse them. Ok, not quite that bad but along those lines. The kind that makes you reconsider eating something no matter how good its supposed to be for you. The plain bread turned out only marginally better. This is the results:
WIE: This human-centered—or even sentient-being-centered—stance seems quite radical at a time when so much of modern progressive thought, across disciplines from ecology to feminism to systems theory, is going in the opposite direction. These perspectives point more toward interconnectedness or interrelatedness, in which the significance of any one part of the whole—including one species, such as the human species—is being de-emphasized. Your view seems to hark back to a more traditional, almost biblical kind of idea. How would you respond to proponents of the prevailing “nonhierarchical” paradigm?
Through your death
Shot a 600dpi copy over to Dyson logos, and for now here's link to a 300dpi scan below:
He asks why the colonisers are allowed to get away with this Carnival of Terror that we all pay for and makes comparison to St Georges Parades where there are few if any arrests and costs the rate payers nothing.
I usually serve this with mashed potatoes, which go so well with the cheesy sauce, and with a colorful vegetable like carrots or squash. Hope your family enjoys this if you try it!
May you stay safe in your New Years celebrations, we will be sitting on our balcony sipping on tea, munching on biscuits watching our towns fireworks whilst I finish some hand-stitching on an extra special gift.
Day 1 is focused on triceps and today my triceps are SORE! Whew. So far it looks like a really good series of quick arms-focused workouts to add to any strength routine. I usually prefer compound moves but every so often I feel like I need a more focused session. This definitely fits the bill!
2 cups canned chickpeas, drained, liquid reserved
I know that in this day and age many major home design projects have been put on hold, but that doesn’t mean a couple of little ones can’t done.
On another note, I want to get my blog to where I have more followers. So maybe I need to have a giveaway. I'm going to ponder the idea and maybe come up with something handmade to give away. I'm still having trouble getting my blog to look like some of the other blogs that I follow. Maybe I can find a little help to fix it up.
These differ from police dogs due to the nature of their job. They are used to sniff out bombs and other threats. Their keen sense of smell also comes in handy for tracking things or people.
Matt and I had our first encounter with Americans since we have been in Buenos Aires. The Bears game was on yesterday so we took a seven minute taxi drive to an American bar called Shoestring Joes. The place was packed with Americans either students, visitors or locals wearing college shirts, khaki shorts, sports hats and almost everyone with a beer in the their hand. Our first night out we noticed the huge cultural difference in social drinking here. Even on a Friday night you won't see a Porteno indulging in a two pint pitcher of beer or stumbling disoriented out of a bar. The people here seem to value being clear-headed and composed. This night was the first time we saw people getting sloppy. I read in a book that Portenos look down on people who get drunk and out of control.They see it as a weakness. This attitude is very refreshing for someone experienced in the Newport Beach Peninsula bar scene. The social scene here is much more pleasant and enjoyable to take part in. People treat themselves with good conversation and story telling.
‘In a 51-47 vote, 43 Senate Republicans and four Democrats filibustered to protect $24 billion in tax breaks for Big Oil. Although a majority voted for Sen. Robert Menendez’s (D-NJ) bill, it fell short of the 60 needed’.
1/2 cup unsweetened cocoa
Two good things for my blog today. First thing is my blog now has 100 followers through Google Friends Connect (GFC).
i will now be home schooling TWO kids 3 days a week (yikes!),
Singin' this is my message to you:
You are a one man band as the producer, designer, PR representative, networker, distribution manager, advertizing agent, etc.
The recent NDAA defense bill contained language expressly intended to hold up approval of L2′s network until further tests are completed. “Our military is heavily reliant on GPS capability to do its job. It is unacceptable for our armed forces to be put at greater risk or made less effective as a result of LightSquared’s operations,” Rep. Michael Turner said in a statement. “Our troops are depending on our government, and the FCC, to do the right thing.”
I do like reading on this blog the little tidbits I write about the baby now and again because it reminds me: nothing lasts forever. Sure, she woke up at 4:30am yesterday and never went back to sleep. That doesn’t mean she will do that the rest of her life.
We spotter a few birds along this stretch including a Buzzard, Woodpecker, Kingfisher, White Egret and of course loads of Coots and Ducks.
Some tips on using this:
While primitive isn't part of the challenge theme this week, we encourage you to give it a try. Don't be intimidated by the style because you just need to think simple images, simple embellishments and papers - everything with a bit of a country feel.
18And they took the Apostles and put them in the common prison.
Usually you stop in a local hotel or on location itself.
Home Alone ... FMC ... 8 PM
2.Successor Of Death
McGregor JA, Mark S, Crawford GP, et al. Varicella zoster antibody testing in the care of pregnant women exposed to varicella. Am J Obstet Gynecol 1987; 157: 281-284.
- Quality and thoroughness are essential to this activity and students will be graded on these expectations.
man, sitting late in the evening with friends in a bar, after the consumption of too much alcohol. He states his entire argument in 382 words, a little more than half of what I have already written here. Though he is normally not a man especially known for succinct pithiness, he seems to have been suddenly
OKAY! So I forgot about this for a while... Honestly I really have been VERY busy!
It starts with just her, singing. Lightly and delicately. Then voices join her. The voices of women for a common cause. It's incredibly powerful.
I felt very sorry but I could not do anything else. I am not sure that this will heal again or whether she will lose that wing. I cannot take her in because I have no facility to keep another bird for weeks. Rudi and Pina are already very nervous because of Gino and Micky – so another sick pigeon inside will not make it easier for both. I also cannot keep her in quarantane for a while as Micky is already occupying our bedroom. So I released her again. We will see what happens tomorrow.
I went through a bunch of some very fun photos that I have of Miss AuBrynne all over the island of Kauai, the place she calls "Ahhh...Home"
Some of the people who set fire to cars and looted businesses after Vancouver lost the Stanley Cup playoffs were identified from pictures posted online.
That's how I kind of feel today. I've got a pain in my shoulder. My checkbook is sad and rather pathetic looking. And a conflict with another that has been brewing for some time now. I left home knowing that I was going to stay late at work tonight on some OverTime, but by the time we get out of rollcall at 0645 we are in need of filling a PSD (public safety dispatcher) position from 4pm-9pm. The pool to choose from is not that large. Think of it like the checkbook thing.............always robbing Peter to pay Paul!
Now that Cash is walking on his own he seems to think that he does not need any help of any kind and is fiercely independent. He wants to feed himself, walk every where, even in the grocery store, he wants to play with all the toys he sees his older siblings play with and he is especially independent when it comes to me being involved. He thinks I should observe all the fancy things he does, but not help him with any of it! He seems to be offended when I lay him down for a diaper change and every single diaper change is a huge ordeal. So any product that makes that diaper change go faster will be a must-have! I actually just saw the commercial for the first time about a week ago and haven't been to the store yet for diapers, but these will certainly be on the list!
"I shouldn’t take such risks, but someone has to fight back. And it feels good. Man, does it ever feel good."
the drinks too, spitting out
Dear, dear Joseph has had quite a couple of years. Just a short time ago he was well into a lifetime of designing and producing in his carpentry studio. And now the Master Artist is radically carving his life into something else.
“The environmental impact per unit of livestock production must be cut by half, just to avoid increasing the level of damage beyond its present level.”
I tried calling the customer service line for my router, thinking that maybe someone there could help me. I was on hold for 42 minutes. That's not an exaggeration. FORTY-TWO MINUTES! I heard Rhapsody in Blue, Moonlight Sonata, Beethoven's Fifth, Barcarolle, William Tell Overature, and Danse Macabre. I started having flashbacks of piano lessons as a child. I never did talk to anyone there.
Aren't these all just lovely?! We hope all this amazing inspiration is helping to get you thinking about all your Hero Arts cards, and maybe push you towards your craft desk for some play-time?
Necklace: Shroomee Necklace- HollyWeird – (Kawaii Fair)
6. Old breweries will continue to sell out to big corps.
First thing this morning, I walked to the bakery with Meg. It was so good. I tried this giant croissant thing with creme cheese in it and had the coconut thing again.
You only come off as psycho-stalker chick if you send gifts, or more than one note.
Will: Personal liberty!
Happy one year of blogging!...and can I just say that "blog" is an unfortunate sounding word?
more interested in tormenting than sitting still.
Hi everyone it's lovely to be back with you, I've missed my crafting and blogging so much.
I never said I was good at this new gig...
Turkle's point is a simple one. We have millions of ways to connect, but few ways to really make connection. She says, "At home, families sit together, texting and reading e-mail. At work executives text during board meetings. We text (and shop and go on Facebook) during classes and when we’re on dates..."
palms up, I know it is impossible to hold
Next is the Good Guardians – Most people might like to choose the good authority figures, but that is not always the choice, and you will hardly find one of those. If you want to choose lie and cover up, that itself are still where hidden anger and shame are. If we want our life to be made whole, we need to face the reality of our lives. Facing the reality, yet knowing the unconditional love, mercy, protections of God, and knowing that God loves each and everyone no matter what, how, where we might have faced and has been into, He is always waiting for our open heart to receive His unconditional love, thought we might not understand everything, but knowing that He just love each one unconditional and He didn’t plan evil for anyone, He is a good God or else we can view God as an evil person.
I like to give my "thread" a rounded end, so I use the "rounded rectangle tool" found in the drop down menu when you click and hold your mouse on the Custom Shape Tool (indicated by the heart in your side tool bar). Or there is a teeny tiny arrow in the bottom right hand corner of the heart you can click to bring up the drop down menu. As you can see, I am really zoomed into my work area and the "stitch" I have drawn is less than 2/32nds wide. This stitch is for a 1" button. You may have to adjust the length a bit for your stitch, depending on how the holes are set in your button. Be sure to "simplify" (rasterize) your shape.
You said that I might get lucky,
Human trafficking is big business! It’s the third largest revenue generator from an illegal source, after drugs and guns and hidden operations have been found in every continent and the most surprising locations. Methods boil down to old fashioned organised crime, corruption, psychological and mental intimidation.
It is in Haiti that the abracadabra and mumbo-jumbo, or ouanga, meaning in English a charm or spell, reaches its height. So much so that the government of the Black Republic has been compelled to add law to the criminal code.
A Linksy Router (value $109)
Lumley
Jo4Him: Relax a Bit
My deepest regret is the air bubbles from the whisking, which are visually distracting and discounted the silky texture of the custard. Do check out this website and recipe with lots of tips on removing air bubbles, demoulding the ramekins etc. This blogger is really THE expert on crème caramel: http://www.cocoandme.com/2008/01/17/the-ultimate-creme-caramel-recipe-with-photographs-of-the-process/
Nuance, B. Hussein.
Well, I'm now back in the Old World after having an extraordinarily good time in the New. “Buridan's Ass” went down very well, thanks to the fine direction of John Doyle and the marvellous acting of Steve Hatzai and Adam Altman. My friends Emma Gibson, Lucille Larkin and Margaret Driscoll went to great lengths to make my visit to Philadelphia both possible and thoroughly enjoyable.
Watching Mission Impossible III. Hard to believe a film about 18th-Century Jesuits in South America could have TWO sequels!
Phone
Does man ever learn? Not without the preaching of the Word of the Lord. He will not learn until the Holy Spirit is allowed to convict him of his wayward ways. He who believes a lie lives in a sphere of lies.
Image Colored with Copics
Change Horses Before You Get Bucked Off
But hey, to make up for my groundfloor savings i'll be receiving 180 from an ebay seller because I selling a few things.. i'm thinking about selling my polaroid camera (don't know why people are still buying them, when they don't even produce film anymore)
That line of thought has led me towards the broader theme of being prepared. What if there’s a catastrophe of some sort? What if I have 3-6 months of money saved in the bank, but no food in the pantry? What if there’s food in the pantry, money in the bank, but my home burns down? I know I could waste a lot of time on the “what ifs”, but I think I would sleep better at night if I had some sort of plan set in place.
Opinion: I don’t feel too strongly about it either way. I think it’s a good variant of Sophia, different enough to differ from it. And it’s nicely cultural as well, but known, thanks to its history here. It’s musical and pretty-sounding as well, which is always a bonus.
Remember that certain things remain constant in times of change: We, as public servants, still have a service to provide to Canadians.
Was it?
As I walked up to the Monastery of Hosios Loukas I realized quickly that I was going to be blown away. As I walked down the narrow cobblestone path I could look out on the foothills of Mount Helicon. Situated down in the valley it had an amazing view, but then you turn left and see the monastery, and I was in love immediately. I have never felt more peaceful then when I walked through here.
There is a new addition in my family, this time from my second oldest sister. She only births girls for some reason. Seeing how three of her four children are by the same man, he is the one to blame. Science taught me that the sperm of a male decides the gender of the baby. If I'm wrong then do correct me!
Now, the cake was a rainbow vanilla butter cake. I didn't make it to the party to get a picture of the cut cake, but maybe I will be able to get pictures to post.
:: The times I have sworn I'll never use one of those disgustingly pink, flowery, and completely pointless headbands on my daughter to make sure everyone can see she's a girl: at least 105. The times I'll actually use one of those disgustingly pink, flowery, and completely pointless headbands to make sure everyone can see my bald child (if she's anything like her mama, she'll be five until any actual hair begins to sprout) is in fact a girl: probably most days.
Hmmmh.
Fear is the dark side of the lack of trust. Last year, I did some best practise research in a different state. I went to a provider who was really working community living. I wanted to see how another state and agency managed this best practise. I spent the day with all of the staff and shadowed them on their jobs. Finally at the end of the day we had a roundtable discussion. I asked: “As a family member, how can a person like me (in my role) work most effectively with people like you (in your role)?” Every single person sitting around the table said “you have got to let go of some of the control, the details, and trust in us.”
UPDATE: It has come to my attention that part of the text in the post below was incorrect.
Well that is it for me tonight Joey…
These words breathe life. Fashioning hope, they grant freedom to live knowing that death is inevitable.
60g or 2 oz sundried tomatoes
And so our heroes, a little battered but still undefeated, stage a strategic retreat and turn their little Honda Civic to the North for a weekend away in the Haliburton area of Ontario.
I started getting interested in soaping when I lost my job last year. I was in an Etsy chat room, when someone posted a cupcake bath bomb. They were SO cute, I IMMEDIATELY searched for a recipe and bought what I needed to make them! Over time I've tweaked my recipe, and have found some soaping blogs online that I follow, and have accumulated other recipes. The Solid Sugar Scrub cubes are some of my favorites to make (and use!)! The lip scrubs, butters and glosses are fun too! There's just so much versatility in bath and body products, and SO many different yummy fragrance combinations, that it's easy to stay excited with what you're making!!
Yesterday I completed this layout, also for the March/April CK Issue Challenge round.
My dear friends,this letters are because I am asking for help,I am retired of my blog,and I want you to know why,and maybe you can help me..
What’s the band’s opinion on file-sharing?
This stage forced us to take a cold, hard look at our story and that's when we finally realized it.
Have a lovely Wednesday!
Filmstar makes beautiful and sexy music~
But... that didn't stop me from eating it all.
Before 1882 dawned, there were at least three or four other societies—one in a Christian church in Rhode Island; another in the St. Lawrence Church of Portland; another in Burlington, Vermont.
As one wise man said, “where the world goes, the Church goes.” Suddenly, this new-wave African music is exerting such a tug on the emotions (and passions) of many African Christians that even those who genuinely have forsaken Western commercial music do listen to Afrobeats – with ‘vulgar’ lyrics, and they know quite well what the songs both ‘mean and imply.’ Many seem to think that this is acceptable – but my friend simply cannot see how this can possibly work.
YES!! THIS IS HOW AMAZING HIS LIFE IS AT F.I.T!!!
I had hoped to find something a bit mork sparkly, and a bit more inspiratinnal than this, but I'm pushed for time today so I'm afraid this will have to suffice for thie week's Theme Thursday. This is a real photographic, vintage postcard of the Treasurer's House in York, c.1949, and was published by Photochrom, number 71238.
Anyway, in my mind…my mind is the beast that likes to think of a gaytopia living inside a straight world, mano y mano, with lots of open progressives who get it. My beast of a mind likes to think it’s less about “do you like the chorizo or the panini” and more about do you love that particular person. In that world, there are fag hags and there are lez luthers. We all enjoy each other’s company with a twinkle in our eye and a chuckle on our lips because humans are nutty. In that world, everyone is happy.
President Sukarno would undoubtedly educate his children by carefully selected tutors.
Merry Christmas baby,
Great advice, Paige! I know a lot of us aren't spending like we used to and making some small simple changes like you suggested is a great way of getting a new look without spending a dime. Gotta love that! Be sure to check out Paige's delicate, feminine pretties in her shop Little White Chapel. Also, head on over to her blog Final Clothes-Out where you will see the journey that little shelf has gone through. =)
With nonstop action, a little romance, and realistic science, debut author Mike Mullin tells a mesmerizing story. Readers will turn Ashfall's pages breathlessly, and continue to ponder Alex and Darla's fate long after they close the book.
Patches did not survive the French Revolution. It seems that they have completely disappeared since then. Unless we count those young ladies who put pencil dots on their faces, in a pale imitation of the taffeta beauty patch of yore.
I could barely believe my eyes when I saw this censored image.
My mind is set on re-decorating my house. My style has changed and I want my home to reflect that taste.
Matthew 6:34 says, “Therefore do not worry about tomorrow, for tomorrow will worry about itself. Each day has enough trouble of its own.” In my action group, we have been studying James, where in chapter 4, verses 13-15 say, “Come now, you who say ‘Today or tomorrow we will go to such and such a town and spend a year there, doing business and making money.’ 14Yet you do not even know what tomorrow will bring. What is your life? For you are a mist that appears for a little while then vanishes. 15Instead, you ought to say, ‘If the Lord wishes, we will live and do this or that.’” This morning during my devotion, I looked at Psalm 2:12, “Blessed are all those who put their trust in him.” This morning during church, we looked at Psalm 27:14, “Wait for the Lord; be strong, and let your heart take courage; wait for the Lord!” Yes, I realize I don’t possess much patience, though I have been called to do so, as it says in Ephesians 4:1-3, “I therefore, the prisoner of the Lord, beg you to lead a life worthy of the calling to which you have been called, 2with all humility and gentleness, with patience, bearing with one another in love, 3making every effort to maintain the unity of the Spirit in the bond of peace.” Enough scripture, but this has all been thrown at me in the last week. Notice a theme here?
I was struck by today's Japanese Maple seeds camouflaged in the leaves. The wind was blowing so it was difficult to get a picture of them between breezes. They're reminiscent of wings don't you think?
Mince the onions and garlic, then sauté with a bit of butter on medium-high heat until soft. Add the spinach, turn down the heat slightly, and cover to wilt.
Ballo ergo sum,
and when I say a few I mean a few plants!
The package includes all three just released stamps, one die cut and embossed piece of Papertrey Inc card stock, two 4x6 sheets of the double sided embossed i do Viburnums by American Craft paper , two 4x6 sheets of the double sided Heidi Grace Purple Houses paper, 10 clear dew drops, a variety of 6 buttons, 5 purple fabric flowers, and 4 feet of each color of twine.
Hollywood has gotten it all wrong! A man should only be doing overly romantic gestures for a woman that he is (1) either already romantically involved with or (2) a woman he has some sort of intimacy with or (3) a woman that has CLEARLY shown the same interest and has clearly shown her sexual attraction to him in some way (usually through body language and non-verbal cues – which I will discuss further down). Other than that, a man doing all of these things for a woman who is CLEARLY not sexually interested in him in that way, is “creepy” or better put – a damn fool! But the saying goes a fool and his money will soon part ways.
The path of prayer thyself hast trod,
Alas, unless your name is Frankenstein, we can't tame it, but we must always respect it. The most important thing to understand about lightning is it goes where it wants to go. Which means, by the way, in spite of the thought for the day, lightning can and does strike in the same place twice, and has, in fact, caused damage at our address several times. Contrary to what you may think, lightning won't necessarily strike the tallest target, and may very well ignore a perfectly good lightning rod in favor of zapping another spot altogether. It strikes where it wants to strike.
again thank you so much for all your ideas, they were very helpful and inspirational !
Then there are the things that kill it for me. Today was like that: I had to get dressed and get out of the house (the physical) and then run a couple errands, and by the time I got home, all I wanted to do was lie down with a bottle of vodka. And I don't even drink vodka. Being out in the world is exhausting. I saw people I liked, and I even talked about my project--this thing I'm making, this poncho--because I had it with me. And while the people were nice and listened politely, it was obvious--of course it was: they were normal, regular people--that they had no idea why I sounded so excited by this length of knit fabric. As long as I'm at home working, it's as if the whole world shares my enthusiasm about whatever-it-is that I'm doing. Out in The Real World, it's obvious that I'm exactly like the weird old guy standing in the middle of his yard gazing up at birds in the sky and going, "Wow."
Spearville has a handful of businesses and services, including our beloved Windmill Restaurant, two sole branch community banks, the township Library and the Spearville Mercantile ("The Merc"), which serves as our primary source of groceries when we're in town. The Merc is half grocery, half old-fashioned department store, with toys, hardware, fabrics, and jewelry. I've often been surprised at the arcane items they carry -- we once needed a replacement weight for an older-model pressure cooker, and there we found it, neatly filed with the other pressure cooker parts.
SQUEAL.
Yoshinori Kataoka - keyboards
This year my Easter gift was the Face Contour Kit from my beloved Sleek Makeup. I’ve been trying my hand at contouring for a while, only to be left with orange streaks courtesy of bronzing powder; so it was about time I invested in a palette.
I’m only doing this so you’ll vote me in again. Well, come to think of it. Now that I binned the idea of electoral reform, you won’t need to vote me in again. I’ll probably be here again by default.
the one on the left was my 'first try' and I was quite pleased with how it
Our annual rummage sale, and let me tell you this one will be our biggest ever as it is really time to let go of fabulous treasure that we won't need for future seasons.
I was back that supermarket in the four week's time. No one batted an eye. And now I knew who the store detectives were.
But I was thankful for the roof over my head. And for the working appliances :)
One large family size package of country style pork ribs (bone in or boneless)
Hmm, was it because I had set in my mind that I would do that diet for a little while, lose weight and then start eating all those fattening foods that I loved so much?
We say we believe in liberty and justice, but what gives us the right to say that our ideas of liberty and justice are the only legitimate ones? The experience of Iraq and Afghanistan should serve as harsh reminders to us, that carrying out our ideas of liberty and justice require a mature understanding of the Western concept of the rule of law over men -- a maturity that neither society yet enjoys.
If it's "the center of the world," why does he live in Manhattan?
Wow, that's a good one! Sometimes, I wonder what my purpose has been. I like to think that during my many years working for the school system, that I made a difference to some of the students. I hope that over the years, I've been a good parent and a good Christian, and served a purpose there. In my crafting role, I hope that I've been a good cheerleader to long-time crafters, and a good mentor to new crafters! Do you know what YOUR purpose in life has been?
I recognise that I have a problem with living within my own personal limits, energetically speaking. I'm not good at being sensible with my own internal resources – I'm too enthusiastic for too many things – which is another way of saying I'm greedy with life and don't recognise when I've hit the end of my rope. I put out a lot of energy, but don't take the time to let my well refill itself.
If you see something else that should be there, let me know.
Every Friday, when I get off of work, I decide to treat myself to driving out Comic Central. Ahh yes, my “local” comic shop. (It looks really creepy when I use the quotation marks there. It makes it seem like I fly in from Venus or something… Just ignore them and pretend that I put them there for comedic effect.)
Here is my #4 card. I again, used French Roast card stock. the inks are Fern, orange, papaya and lichen. The 2 flowers were just some I had laying around. The pattern paper is one and the color is.....AUG can you believe I can't remember the color pattern - I should be spanked LOL
Banda Aceh police took the arrestees on Tuesday afternoon to the Aceh State Police School for “reeducation.” Aceh police chief Ins. Gen. Iskandar Hasan described the punishment awaiting them when they reached the police school in the Seulawah hills, 62 kilometers east of he capital.
I’m excited. Halloween is around the corner. Time for our inner children to come out and play pretend. We get to make believe that we are something, and someone that we are not. I don’t know about you, but I’m a huge fan of more authentic costumes. So much so, that I generally make my own versions. (Also, why spend 60-100 bucks on a cheesy badly made costume in a plastic bag that you’ll only wear once right?)
new lil side table fo' sale, friends.
Workers are free to choose who they work for, where they work, and in what conditions. They do not have to accept what their “corporate overlords” tell them. In reality, workers are free to work where they like to the limits of one’s ability (if you work at a gas station next to a hospital, you probable can’t get a job as a brain surgeon). It’s true, that employers have a measure of control over employees. You do the employer’s work at the time you agreed to–that’s what a job is. It’s also true that employees have a measure of control over the employer. Employees have skills that the employer is willing to paying for. If an employee has a skill worth paying for, competition between for the best talent will drive prices. Obtaining talented people is most easily done by offering superior wages.
Last November, readers of, among others, Parade Magazine and Cardmaker Magazine saw an announcement for a free "open amateur poetry contest". Poems of "24 lines or less" could be sent to a New York City address, and would then be eligible for $100,000 in prizes. A perk of entering: all poets would receive a "personal critique" of their poem.
Normally I do not sleep post lunch but for some days nights have been stuffy and restless. Unable to sleep I toss and turn in the bed, dozing on and off into slumber and wake up with a start.
This book had completely passed me by. I had never even heard of the author, and it was not until a friend returned from a year of travelling in South America, that a copy was placed in my hands, with the most heartfelt of recommendations. The cover of my copy (right) did not exactly inspire me, but once I read the first page, I was well and truly engrossed.
A saying that is so common within the Madison Scouts Drum & Bugle Corps. Such history and rich tradition. I just returned from the January Madison Scouts camp at Grapevine HS in Grapevine, TX. I was auditioning for the Assistant Drum Major position. It was a tough experience, nonetheless. Going up for this position against vets and guys who were at least two years older than I am now. It was hard, but I just played it cool. But besides that part, the camp was just phenomenal. The corps, only brass and percussion, rehearsed greatly and put together 4 minutes of the show music already. And this show will be one to rival great Madison shows in the past. I can see it will be a truly FANTASTIC year for the corps. Great performers, great staff, and great show… Everything needed for a return to the top. I did receive a callback although, let’s just hope that I have the opportunity to be a part of this great group.
69Back through the paths of pleasing sense I ran,
When the power of the applicant is based on something weird,
Today, all the blossoms are gone.
In yesterday's blog I wrote about language classes offered through UNA's Office of Continuing Studies and Outreach and wanted to briefly expand on that today.
Ayinger Celebrator Doppel Bock
Hope to see you on the interwebs!!
Who is the mythical being you most dislike, and what made you feel that way about them?
Karl Marx talks of exploitation of labour. More vicious is the exploitation of women which we practise shamelessly. The amount of drudgery that a woman does in the privacy of the house would need scores of maids. Yet all that she gets in return is shabby and sullen treatment. No allowance is made even for the career women who have a hard time walking the tight rope – managing the household and the office at once. A silent, suffering woman is not merely the stuff of Hindi films. It is a harsh reality which belittles us in the eyes of others.
The problem of the church today is not that we missed the proper configuration of what a church should be. The church’s problem is its weakness in the face of circumstances and the power of Satan in the world. Jesus told us that the powers of evil are unable to stand against the authority and might of His Church. So we must infer that much of the church is not His and that much of Christianity is not the manifestation of His life.
I do expect Parenthood to return for the reasons I mentioned above. I also expect The Office to return for possibly a final season. Parks & Recreation needs one more season for syndication and is their most loved comedy. Its renewal is a sure thing. I believe Community will return for a final season as well. It’s NBCs second most loved comedy by critics, another year will give them 93 total episodes for syndication which will net them nice profits. The show also does well with young males. Lorne Michaels has two bubble shows. I’d expect a final 13 episode season for 30 Rock but I don’t expect Up All Night to return. NBC has too many underperforming comedies. They need to rebuild and they can’t renew them all. That being said, I wouldn’t be shocked to see them renew Whitney. It did better as a self-starter on Wednesday with total viewers and the demo then Up All Night on Thu and Community too. If they end up picking up some multi cams (like Roseanne’s Downwardly Mobile) I would not be shocked to see it paired with Whitney. That leaves Harry’s Law. The demo is not good, but find me one other show on NBC that gets 9 million viewers that’s not The Voice. You can’t. So yes, the demo is awful but why wouldn’t NBC renew this show for Friday night where it would likely retain those viewers? At this point I’m thinking it has a very good chance to return. Oh and expect lots more of Betty White’s Off Their Rockers.
The real nice guys, though – those guys definitely finish first and more importantly, finish most successfully. Do you know the kind of smile you can put on a woman’s face just by opening her door when you guys walk to the car? Or calling when you said you would? Planning a date that consists of more than dinner and a movie?
Famine
2. Where is the best place you've ever vacationed?
Immediately put glaze on warm buns. Cool at least 10 minutes, then cover with a generous portion of icing.
1/2 tsp red chilli powder
we cannot rise above the limitations of our character
Event Details:
What I thought I'd do is start a post that is purely questions (and hopefully, answers) from readers. This way we will have one location for readers to exchange information. I will then make a permanent link to this post and put it on the left side of the blog.
I just can't make the thoughts stop - I want a way to turn them off. I noticed them a bit more as the weather became warmer, but then I wound up being without my meds for a week or two and they got much worse. Luckily I got a few weeks worth of pills so I'm safe/sane for a little while now. LOL!
966 **D-V/2/1987. “Aristotle and the Scope of the Law.” Hellenic Law Society of Northern California, St. Nicholas Ranch and Retreat Center, Dunlap, California. (Incorporated in Item C-1987(4), above, pp. 207-13.)
Listen to your inner dialogue. How do you think and feel about your current and future jobs? If your thoughts are positive, you may have genuinely connected with your life’s destiny. If your thoughts are negative concerning work, egoic influences may be hindering your progress.
Although he proved to be durable through the last three years for N.C. State, Terrell missed two games during his junior year after needing surgery to repair a knee injury; he also needed to redshirt during his freshman year in 2008 when he was coming off of knee surgery that ended his high school career early. With the Packers trading up for Manning, Robert Francois may need to worry ab out his current spot on the roster, but down the road (next season) AJ Hawk may need to play a lot better.
where I heard the forlorn but
“For this reason, the kingdom of heaven is like a king who wanted to settle accounts with his slaves. As he began settling his accounts, a man who owed ten thousand talents was brought to him. Because he was not able to repay, the lord ordered him to be sold, along with his wife, children and whatever he possessed, and repayment to be made. Then the slave threw himself to the ground before him, saying, ‘Be patient with me, and I will repay you everything.’ The lord had compassion on that slave and released him, and forgave him the debt.
Chisora accused Haye of "glassing him", before saying at least four times that he would shoot the former WBA heavyweight champion.
When Recyclebank was founded six years ago, no one had heard of gamification, the concept of rewarding non-game actions with points, scores or other rewards. Thanks to Foursquare, the popular geo-social network that has gamified exploration, many more of us are familiar with the term.
Second, Sutton’s task force and/or the ACNA leaders supporting this initiative is anticipating that the ACNA may benefit from a split in the OCA. The dropping of the Filoque clause from the Nicene Creed would eliminate an obstacle to breakaway congregations and clergy from the OCA migrating to the ACNA. It would also remove an obstacle to unaffiliated Orthodox joining the ACNA.
Chill wort to about 76˚, transfer to carboy, add water to 5 gallons, aerate, pitch yeast slurry.
“Me too,” he said softly. “Can we get out of here? Basements creep me out.”
I'm not sure anyone out there is still listening, but I'm whispering in case you are...
And, that brings me to:
The more historic housing blocks in the centre of town have gardens on the inside, each divided from the other by a high wall, so that only those living in the upper storeys of the surrounding houses can overlook the neighbours' gardens. The whole interior of the (typical) block where I live, must be the size of a football field. I am living two floors up from the ground floor and have a grand view over at least the nearer gardens -- a view which I enjoy every day. Each garden is different, each has a different shape and size, some are higher, some lower, but all have character.
- Frank Beard – drums, percussion, alto saxophone (02,08)
It took him a few days of visiting but eventually he signed and Mario Williams is a Buffalo Bill. The more time he spent there, the more I thought he wasn’t going to sign. Maybe he was acclimatising or maybe he was waiting for the offered money to rise. I sure wouldn’t say no to a guaranteed $50,000,000.00
Last week we had a play date with the cutest kid, Nixon. Isn't that the cutest name ever? Oh and did ya'll know that when ducks mate they look like they are killing each other? I had no idea! Cassie and I thought they were just picking on a little duck so we started launching playground gravel at them to let the little one try and make a break for it only to find out it was males and a female. Weird! They looked like they were trying to gouge her eyes out.
Or should it be him saying "Before white-coated boffins with spectacles, clipboards, pipettes and brains the size of Luxembourg discovered pasteurization in 1860, all beer was made using spontaneous fermentation"?
Him: Shrug.
Me: No, you certainly wouldn't. We would call the nice firemen.
I took several pictures with shirts but only one gentleman approached me. He had frosted hair and a slight European accent. He was wearing Ed Hardy. He introduced himself and handed me his card. I found myself wondering why he was talking to me. We were so obviously mismatched. Then I remembered I had made the first move! I’d made a pass at him. Nervously I tried to make small chat. From the looks of him, I assumed he wore cologne, and there had been one shirt I picked that smelled like an amazing cologne, so I told him he had super cologne. He blanched and swore he didn’t wear cologne anymore. Now I’d said something that made it seem like I could instantly recognize his scent and match it with one of the many shirts I’d smelled. I was that tuned in with him. He was looking at me like we had this deep connection. I think I said I had to go to the bathroom and politely ran away.
Janice: I had just started writing QUEEN OF THE WAVES (a Titanic-themed novel for Summerside Press) when I got a note from a friend, asking if I would be interested in taking a Titanic anniversary cruise. My response? “No thanks! The only Titanic cruise I would consider taking would have to be a virtual one.” As I typed the words, the idea hit: Set up a Facebook group, title it Queen of the Waves, and invite people on a “virtual” Titanic cruise. Use the name of my POV character (Tessa Bowen) as cruise director.
Captain Fairweather smiled benignly and walked over to the Frenchman, grasping his arm. “Inspector Cocteau,” he said warmly, “I’m enormously grateful for your work on this case. It’s been a true education to see a real detective in action. Our own Scotland Yard could learn a lot from your methods. Perhaps you should pay them a visit after the cruise. In the meantime, you’re here to relax and enjoy the facilities. Have you tried the coq au vin in the upper level restaurant?”
set of asterisks where memories rest
I am sorry I have taken so long to return to this subject, this is partly because other things, the stuff of everyday life, have got in the way but to a far greater degree the delay was because this is a much bigger subject than even I had imagined. Hence, I as the writer have struggled to express the magnitude of my subject.
7. Coriander powder, 1 teaspoon.
But before I let you loose into your own kitchen to do this there are a few things I’d like you to remember when smoking fish:
And as an added holiday bonus...
So the archbishop was wrong to attack them on this issue. Banks did have a case for increasing rates. He may have been trying to say they did not explain their case adequately. But, if so, what is he complaining about? Some kind of PR failure?
Post 70 of 180
In terms of material things, she has all she wants. We can't give her youth and years and, really, I'm not sure she'd want them back. So I said to the children, what should we give great-grandma for her birthday?
What I think went wrong:
Typical me though – I managed to spend a whole three days in the centre of Amsterdam and not see anything that you’re supposed to see.
Okay, so I realize that the last couple of posts may have got ya'll down. I know you didn't come here to listen to me whine and proselytize. You've got problems of your own. But, you should know that I am not always such a curmudgeon. In fact, I'm generally quite amicable. I'm a funny guy and people fucking love me, yo. And so, in the spirit of being not a Negative Nancy, but choosing instead to spread the so-called P.M.A., we'll listen to an album that is on the gentler, happier side of the coin.
The character of Erlendur is a study in grief. Searching (for the lost loved-one) is a common feature of bereavement and Erlendur’s life as a policeman is an extension of his futile search for his lost brother. It is a recurring aspect of the Reykjavik Crime Mysteries that the crime under investigation is often an old one in which the identity of the victim becomes as important to uncover as the murderer. And so the constant theme of these books is the solution of crime through the excavation of the past (in Silence of the Grave, Erlendur literally calls in archaeologists to help). Compared with many other crime novels, the outcome of Erlendur’s investigations is often unconventional in that the plot is not resolved by the arrest of the murderer. The reason for this is that the stories mainly consist of a search for a missing person; sometimes this is a search for the murderer, but just as often it is a search for the identity of the victim, or, if the victim is known, a search for some truth about their life that will reveal their real identity. Not all of these missing persons are successfully found.
#11) Free champagne / scotch tastings
Sam from the Daily Dimwit always comes up with more than than I do Astros so trading with him is both easy and hard. The prize of this group is the first card. It is a 1998 Larry Walker cut from the back of a box of Hamburger Helper. I have been trying to track down this card since I missed out on drafting one last year and now I have it. Astros will on their way down south shortly, Sam.
At first glance, the style of the letters seem to date this seal to c.700 BC. This would mean it comes from the reign of Hezekiah. Palaeography is, however, not an exact science, so we should give some leeway either side of that date. However, if this date is correct, it would be further artefactual evidence of the Judean tax system. We already have the many jar handles stamped with למלך (‘for the king’) from across Judah, and this seal would seem to belong to the same or close contemporary milieu.
As time passes and I feed them the simplest lunch possible of cereal and bananas and yogurt, it is time to start getting ready to leave for school. I get their shoes and socks on while they are eating. Coats, hats, mittens and Michael's school bag are all laid out and ready for the "out the door blitz" filled with lots of winter fleece, puffy materials, and plenty of struggling and arguing that happens when we go anywhere in the winter.
JEMS is proud to be able to partner with and present some of the choice recordings in the D & D archives. Some of these recordings have been around for years but none of the master tapes or safety copies in some cases have ever been digitized until now. Dave and Donn taped many shows in and around the Seattle area in the 70's and also were contemporaries of some of the JEMS members. Volume 25 is one of Daves brother's master recordings of Mahavishnu Orchestra. Great show here and possibly an uncirculated performance prior to June 2011.
singers do sing with an American accent. I used to love that about
No. of unemployed people in Norway declined to 85000 in February vs 90000 in November vs 87000 in January. (RTT News)
The terrible abuse and sexual exploitation of women and children trapped in prostitution have been a blight on our nation for many years. Why the urgency now to decriminalise the sex industry - a policy the overwhelming body of international evidence shows does not help women and children in prostitution?
Randy Mosher writes about brewing with sorghum in his book Radical Brewing. I'm going to re-read what he has to say about it. I'll come up with my own recipe and post it in the near future.
When it is time to sing, read that sentence from the Proclamation and explain to the children that living these principles will help strengthen our families. Have a child draw a wordstrip from the can and pantomime living that principle. The rest of the children can guess which of the principles they are acting out. After the children guess, say the sentence together naming that principle. Then remove the word card from the board and sing the song.
Santorum goes out of his way to make sure his scorn towards gays is well-known, forsaking the true meanings of conservatism in government and individual liberty, principles that the GOP candidate for President in 2012 should strive to uphold.
Mike: I’m sure it’s not Denzel Washington. You’re terrible at stuff like this. You’re the only person in the world who confuses Al Pacino and Robert DeNiro.
The Harbin festival is one of the world's four largest ice and snow festivals, along with Japan's Sapporo Snow Festival, Canada's Quebec City Winter Carnival, and Norway's Ski Festival.
And not funny ha-ha.
FBS Schools in Florida: Florida, Florida State, Miami, South Florida, Central Florida, Florida Atlantic, and Florida International.
Greetings, Fearless Readers! I am back among you again. I don't come with lame excuses for my long absence, because for once, I have a good one. I moved studio (apartment)! And what a trip it's been. I'm not entirely out of the other apartment yet, having two gigantic wooden type thingies I don't have room for and don't know how to get rid of. Not true, really, my sister is taking one. I'm running out of time, though, and getting a little nervous about their removal.
I have a confession to make; this is actually one of my greatest guilty pleasures. Here it goes….
As most expats know, coming back to visit family and friends is often like running a marathon, trying to see everyone and do everything possible in the short time you're there. This is a longer visit than the last time Ben was here for Christmas/New Year's 2008/9, so we're packing in even more this trip.
It was at about the end of 2008 that people began to have growing concerns about money. I told the Chairman repeatedly that he should distance himself from the financial affairs of the Party and also that he had to get an independent auditor. I also pointed out that the begging letters, which were coming from Northern Ireland at an almost indecent rate, had to balanced out with letters requesting practical help and activity from those who could not afford to pay. The response to this was that ‘people should be embarrassed into feeling that they should pay up’!
Not that I envy the task before Wolff and Beckman. It could be there's no answer here, because it's very likely the real problem with Adweek is that it needs to rejuvenate and relaunch itself during a time that's never been so inhospitable to magazines.
I knew the presidents backwards and forwards. I remember reading that Cleveland was elected president twice with Benjamin Harrison sandwiched in between. I also remembered that he married someone half his age while in the White House.
I thank God every day for watching over her and keeping her safe!! I could have been going to
You see when you get married and then have children you have to start your own christmas traditions. The only problem is I feel as if I have absolutely no idea how to make Christmas special let alone how to make it all about Jesus. With Princess Eli only being 16 months I feel as if she can't really understand much so what can I really do? So I prayed about it and today I came across this stirring blog post.
"Clouds over Harstene", 5 x 9 In, Oil on Museum Board
“The commander of the Revolutionary Guards, Brig. Gen. Seyyed Mehdi Farahi, stated in August that the Safir missile, which is capable of transporting a satellite into space, can easily be launched parallel to the earth’s orbit, which will transform it into an intercontinental ballistic missile. Western analysts didn’t believe this would happen until 2015. Historically, orbiting a satellite is the criterion for crediting a nation with ICBM capability.” -WND.com
Aaron James bass
Who We Are?
Then that'll be that. His fifteen minutes will be up and hopefully he'll blow his brains (or whatever is in his head) out.
As with The Woman Before Me the facts in this case appear clear cut. No one is accusing Alice of misrepresenting the facts or of trying to wriggle out of anything. But what we believe to be true isn’t always what turns out to be true. And that is what Cate Austin, as she carries out her investigation, uncovers.
Whisky Galore! – 2
First feeling you get when this happens to you is mild shock. I was kind of waiting for this to happen in any case, it's been on the cards. So whatever, I have this place, for the time being, and I have a back up Wordpress blog and my calligraphy blog. I have always been a good girl guide - I am always prepared!!
I am feeling a little sad today, just kind of blah (is that a feeling..?). And I am sitting here thinking of the things I enjoy. These quiet mornings, two boys still sleeping soundly. I have pictures of what mornings generally look like here at the house. And that is what I reflect on, when days seem sad, the joy of the day, the blessings of our mini-farm, the centered-ness I find in family and friends. I miss my brothers, that live so far away, I don't get to see them often enough. I miss the ocean that calls me daily, I really need to take a vacation, inhale that salt air, that cleanses every pore of my being, refreshes, awakens, rejuvenates me.
my skin. I may have lived an ordinary existence, but I can fight.
Mainstream media has spewed us propaganda under “Operation Iraqi Freedom.” The U.S. led invasion was painted as a project to liberate the people of Iraq from a dictator regime. Birk’s prints visually depict the real situation on ground behind these false claims. The Iraqi people suffered the same harsh conditions under the occupation as they did under Saddam Hussein: “Same shit, different Saddam.”
Todorovski’s remarks come after several days of police silence about the gruesome murders that took place on April 12.
The audience is involved in all of this. We are sympathetic to both sides, and even empathetic to them as well. As the characters proceed through their grief, we share their search for answers. And at the end of it all, we may not understand why we are in this place, but at least we have some satisfaction by joining in the character’s need for revenge.
1/2 small cabbage, shredded thinly
catch you soon,
20But that we give them orders to keep themselves from things offered to false gods, and from the evil desires of the body, and from the flesh of animals put to death in ways against the law, and from blood.
Hook: As much as Dacian is a shameless party boy, he desperately seeks his parents approval and will jump at opportunities to prove his worth, especially in contribution to academia to impress his parents who are both professors.
Although Chloe isn’t a fan yet, I could do with a bit of light entertainment when I am stuck in the house all day and feeling a tad depressed. It’s perfect when you are doing some light dusting. DOGTV could end up a cult hit – and not just with those who bark.
I have completed three marathons to date – London twice in 1998 and 1999 and the Potteries in 1998 – and I ran lots of warm-up races at 5K, 5 milers, 10K, ten milers and half-marathons. The key I was told by experienced marathon runners is to build up your stamina as it is the time you are out running that can be the real test, that and the infamous wall. Another top tip is the day after a big race and your legs hurt when walking down stairs go backwards down the stairs, much easier.
I turn around and meet him halfway. I pick him up and lay him back on his bed and say, “What do you want from me? I’m sick too! You’re not going to sleep in my bed! You keep kicking me! I need sleep in order to take care of you, little boy!”
-Mix the melted chocolate and make it smooth.
I've been reading a book called Imagine: How Creativity Works by Jonah Lehrer. It's really made me think not just about cardmaking, but about how I approach other things in life as well, like school work and what I'm actually teaching my kids. Super book.
Very smooth going down bigg complex hoppy flavour and a perfect malt balance to keep the hops in tow.
BG: Yeah, on missions he was Mr. Phelps.
Glitter, Glitter --- You're O' So Prettee.
Hours:
In the Google cases, the question was: if Google’s use of AdWords does not constitute a trade mark infringement, does Google benefit from the hosting defence? It would appear that the purpose of the question was: if Google was not found liable for infringement itself, could it be liable for the infringement by a party that had paid for an AdWord? The ECJ held that Google’s use of trade marks is not an infringement. However, because advertisers that pay for AdWords are potentially liable, if Google were to have secondary liability for an advertiser’s infringement, would Google be shielded by the hosting defence?
I think this article says so much. For me, when I am training for a race I do a lot of visualizing. Almost every important race I have run, at one point or another I would picture myself crossing the finish line. Every time, I would mentally be able to see the time on the clock and see myself feeling strong and excited at the finish.
In a heavy based soup pot, heat oil over med-high heat. Add onion, cook till golden brown. Add garlic, cook 1 more minute. Add broth and squash, cook for 10 minutes. Add remaining ingredients, lower heat, cover and cook till heated through, about 7 minutes.
At one place I am writing a blog for site, at other I am testing a site, on another I am finding essentials for a work, another one where I am googling images for the blog, at photoshop I am editing the images and watermarking them, on excel sheet I am preparing the xyz sheet by switching over the 2 folders and extracting data, then I am searching for top news for my other blog and I am also writing this very blog at the same.
Jason was their best friend for a few minutes.
Moreover, unlike boys, girls lie to each other. We are so self obsessed and so conscious that we tend to lie. We just can’t help it. We hide our emotions, try to make our personality look clean, appear confident but deep within we know what we truly are. God only knows, when the drama will stop.
Crime by Alix Lambert reviewed by Cameron Ashley
And here is a before picture of the side of our house ...
I chided myself only in the nicest way of course. It wasn't an anxiety attack. I wasn't foaming at the mouth with guilt, regret, self-hatred. I could see it shimmering on the horizon though, could almost taste its metal shine. I would confess to you if it were an anxiety attack. Instead I'll be honest: it was a consti-fucking-pation attack.
“It wasn’t until 1938 that the teachings and efforts and studies that had been going on were crystallized in the form of the Twelve Steps. I didn’t write the Twelve Steps. I had nothing to do with the writing of them. . . . We already had the basic ideas, though not in terse and tangible form. We got them, as I said, as a result of our study of the Good Book.”
- What thinks Christ of me?
About 1/3 skein worsted weight yarn (I used 'I Love This Cotton' and a twisted cotton from Walmart)
WINNIPEG — A trial began Monday for a former Manitoba police chief accused of deliberately torpedoing a drunk-driving investigation into another officer. Harry Bakema is accused of obstruction of justice, perjury and breach of trust in a car crash that killed Crystal Taman, a mother of two who was stopped at a red light while driving to work on the morning of Feb. 25, 2005. Taman’s compact car was rear-ended by a truck driven by Derek Harvey-Zenk, an off-duty Winnipeg police officer who had been up all night partying with colleagues. Despite clear road conditions and a big warning light ahead of the intersection, Harvey-Zenk never hit the brakes as his pickup plowed into Taman’s stopped car. The accident happened in the Winnipeg bedroom community of East St. Paul, where Bakema was the police chief. He was among the first officers on scene.The Crown’s first witness Monday testified that Bakema was pretty certain what had caused the crash.“He told me (Harvey-Zenk) was impaired at the time” said RCMP Cpl. Chris Blandford, a collision reconstruction expert who attended the scene hours later.“He was very disappointed . . . that a member of the Winnipeg Police Service was an offender.”But any evidence of intoxication never made it to Harvey-Zenk’s trial. http://thechronicleherald.ca/canada/91705-rcmp-officer-testifies-at-former-manitoba-police-chief-s-trial
I'm gonna be honest: this is going to be the best thing ever. Move over polio vaccine, cloud-based information sharing and pizza with cheese in the crust!
Then Jenny came along and completed it in a freakish 12.6 seconds (she actually managed to complete it in under 6 seconds in a later attempt, but we only count the first…thankfully). Blew my freaking mind.
The campaign calls this woman a hero, and pretends her cause is moral. It isn't moral, and the word hero should never be used in such a glib fashion.
I guess I’ll go eat lunch and then get to my Revisions, Math, and English (woop-a-dee-doo… hint, hint).
World Bank Logistics Performance Index
I have to change…and look at those challenges in a more positive way…
This person might possibly be a friend, casual acquaintance, relative, work college, lover, parent or child?
This man did not see this coming because all he saw, from day to day, were the small accommodations or concessions to Muslims. Things like single-sex swimming baths, halal meat, more mosques, Muslim organisations and community leaders gaining more power and influence, non-Muslim women being forced to wear the hijab in Muslim areas or in Islamic buildings, 'hate crimes' = blasphemy against Islam, etc. Bugger this! Here’s a longer list of accommodations and concessions. (Skip past if it gets a bit boring.):
Management has little incentive to rush things. Their position only gets stronger. The mediator has zero incentive. YOUR NEGOTIATING COMMITTEE is th only possible vehicle for expediting this process.
to separate,
When he goes to work sometimes we have a conversation that goes a little something like this.
Justice Theis decided that a living will that the wife of a man known as XB supposedly agreed to, was a valid living will.
11. 30 Carrington Dr… Asked $2,550,000. Sold $1,500,000. Started 4/2003
"It started off with a group of white guys who were chanting 'England, England'. I thought they were just football fans, but then a larger group of black and Asian people turned up and it all kicked off.
- The Uglies, by Scott Westerfield
So if you’ve noticed that I’ve been rather proliferate with blogging these past few days it’s because I’m a captive in my own home, and strep is my jailer. I needed a few days away from civilization to get the antibiotics in my system so I was no longer contagious. I also needed rest and re-hydration. Most of Monday I could barely talk, although by the afternoon I felt well enough to get out of bed. The hard part was feeling well enough to be bored, but easily worn out after attempting more than a five-minute conversation. I broke into a sweat just taking the trash to the curb.I am planning my “outbreak” tomorrow, when I return back to work. I can’t remember being so excited to clock in and sit at my desk. I’ll probably plan out my wardrobe this afternoon and wash my hair. Something about being sick always makes my hair look so busted. NO ONE looks cute when sick.
I started to cry when it showed that dad in the crib with his tired but fighting sleep baby.
The NorCal Pirate Festival is held in June right on the San Francisco Bay waterfront in Vallejo. I've never gone in costume, but it is an event where tons of people dress up, so I decided I needed a pirate outfit for this year. I wanted to do something a little different than the usual and tried to go for something a little bit 18th century, a little bit gothic lolita, and a little bit cocktail dress.
And then I imagined of all things a sticky note. Would God leave a sticky note on our remote control that says, “I’m here!”? Would He leave a note on our laptop or Ipad that says, “I have what you need!”? Would he leave a note on our cell phone that says, “Please consult me first!”? Where would God leave a sticky note reminding us to seek Him first? What item or person or thing do we usually run to first if there is something we run to before God? Oooooooooh, that’s a sticky question!
Christine Cryne
But three minutes later, I drank a beer and completely forgot about the note, the sheriff's department, and the ass raping.
I was up late, the night before, pulling everything out of the basement -
That’s how it was for many, many years. I’m fortunate to have caught the tail end of this era; Anthony passed away in 1981 and Teresa in 1993. Both lived into their 90s, and although they lived steady lives and rarely left Kenosha, it strikes me as the height of adventure to have boarded a ship a century ago and left one’s homeland and family behind, never to see either again. I know it was due more to survival than adventure, considering the options in Italy at that time. And although Kenosha was populated by thousands of Italian immigrants, many from the same hillside towns and of similar means, on some level this Midwestern city must have seemed as foreign to Anthony and Teresa Tenuta as Beijing or Tehran would be to me.
I was hesitant about making this post because Randy was n.o.t. happy the first weekend he had them on. He was determined to go in Monday morning and have them removed. Luckily the orthodontist told him that almost all of his adult patients feel this way and he asked him to give it 2 weeks and if he still wanted them off he would do it.
Whether it was truly deliberate or not is beside the point. And it’s too late to take it back – and really, any more spin or damage control on that’s just gonna make it worse. This kinda thing is just one of those things you really can’t fix – not in the public eye – other than maybe apologizing and moving on from there.
Daisy would never tell! But I won't! I just LIKED this bridge
3. Let 'em make as many Hulk movies as they want - HE IS GENERAL ROSS.
It is no secret that my ideas of centre right Welsh Nationalism are directly opposed to Leanne Wood's Socialism and Republicanism.
The other thing I like about working with flash is that you can experiment with form in a way that can be very difficult in longer pieces.
age of internet users is 26.
Watching Cecil cut the cord was priceless…so much joy!
Top Obama bundler bashes Israel, the Fox News segment Ice Berg OMG: J Street field director admits that their ‘job’ is to ‘move’ American Jews to the Left on Israel Небесный всадник by IDFrussiandesk He can dish it out, but can he take it? Purpose of J-Street is not to reflect US Jewish opinion, but to change it Instead of “Israel” say “the Israeli colonialist occupation” – on PA TV Leading Egyptian Presidential candidate calls Israel ‘racist,’ treaty ‘a national security threat’ Ardent Zionists v Enlightened Jews: An Assault on British Jewry New IAF chief: Air Force prepared for all scenarios Instead of “Israel” say “the Israeli colonialist occupation” – on PA TV GOC Southern Command awards citation to family of Sgt. Naftali “Случайная война” на периферии Европы может начаться в любой момент Boo Hoo! Euroweenies complain because their illegal structures in Judea and Samaria are being torn down Video: David Ben Gurion reads Israel’s Declaration of Independence The PA, unlike Israel, has failed to work toward peace The Middle East Media Sampler 5/14/2012: Congress vs UNRWA Lies, damned lies and the Palestinian Central Bureau of Statistics Soccer Dad’s Middle East Media Sampler Ruh Roh… Shas, UTJ both shunning Tal Law ‘talks’ Video: J Street Leader Carinne Luck Says Goal Is To Convince Jews To Support Washington Policies IDF’s elite airborne rescue unit completes training Naqba day clashes… at Tel Aviv University Evidence of Iran’s nuclear weapons program mounting Gulen Muslim Charter Schools: “60 Minutes” Does Mostly a Whitewash (VIDEO) A Greek Tragedy: The EU at Colonus COGAT coordinates export of clothing from Gaza to foreign markets Robert Spencer: Did Muhammad Exist? The Independent attacks British Jewry The Forward’s Eli Vally Draws Cartoon For 972 Depicting Netanyahu Raping Obama For “Nakba Day” – an e-book that tells the truth These are the Soldiers Who Thwarted Last Week’s Terror Attacks Listen to Grandpa, Andy Ling (video) Hamas Extends Administrative Detention of Fatah Member in Gaza Arlene Kushner On The Palestinian Hunger Strike And Why Egypt Is Involved If They Recognize Israel’s Need For Secure Borders, Why Do They Insist On Unilateral Concession? Egyptian minister wants to ensure Sinai land cannot be sold to Jews
We are your bosom friends.
I gasp the words out, nearly in tears as I finally ask her. I want to confront her face to face. For her to tell me it's not true.
If for some reason you still have doubts about veganism, just remember that elephants and gorillas are vegans.
National Defense Medal, 1969
We've also been on the road, as usual, doing mileage for work and family business. The open road can still be a place of peace and solitude as the kilometres pass by... The seasons are definitely turning, and I just love the glorious roadside grasses at this time of year.
I was almost home when I heard the car. I checked to make sure Clover was off the road, and swooped Rosa Parks up into my arms. Dogs safe, I then remembered how I was dressed. Brown jersey pajama bottoms, sagging at the fanny, bagging at the knees; pink flowered T-shirt top; navy blue and gray argyle socks pulled up over the cuffs of the pajama bottoms; red and black slip-on Hush Puppies. And the blazer. I hadn’t brushed my hair; I hadn’t brushed my teeth. There was no place to hide.
I finished my first "novel" at age fifteen. It took me two years to write it. I laugh a lot now, because it was about 90 pages long, and that seemed sooooo long to me. It was probably a novella, not a novel.
A friend of mine was doing jury service recently.
I always loved this simple craft for Halloween. Buga loves lollipops - she doesn't get them often, but maybe that's why she loves them so much. I decided that it would be fun to turn these little Dum Dums into Ghosts for the holiday. Buga loved seeing the transformation.
I hope you all will join me in this challenge and I'm looking forward reading your comments.
what blueberry look like in brooklyn
She said he had grabbed her throat after she had sworn at him.
One story rejected.
I know from the stats on this blog that it doesn’t get read very much, but that’s fine, this blog is for me, this is my challenge.
As it turns out this is one of my talents as a teacher, in the lab or in the field. I hate intellectual panic. I hate fear of the unknown. I hate the idea that there are areas of knowledge that are only appropriate for some people and not others. I argue and act for the democratization of science, and the inherently democratizing nature of scientific practice when done well.
I confess I have a singular television pleasure (Pawn Stars doesn’t count): The Office. I cannot help myself. If you have watched The Office you know how incredibly absurd Michael Scott, played by Steve Carell, is, but you are willing to look through him because even in absurdity there can be wisdom.
The machine, the microphone, the screen are our pulpit; the press, the production room, the screening hall and the transmission center are like our church. The temptations are many, but we shall make ours the words of Paul, “I do all things for the Gospel." --ALBERIONE
And they didn't disappoint. There were beautiful sets of armor from the Tudor and Stuart kings, some with such elaborate hand engraved decoration that it made one dizzy with admiration for the craftsmen.
After these things…
Dairy cows are especially labor intensive
I’m a huge tea drinker, but I like black coffee. I don’t put cream in either one.
Her high school requires a year long Sophomore Service Learning Project. Through assignments in History and English classes, students study a “world problem” and present their findings at the end of the year. This poem was part of an English assignment.
Today - legs OUCH!
I have cried out to the Lord to take me as His own and in His mercy He has heard my cry and has pierced my ear. He has changed me into a new creation. It is no longer Michael who lives but Christ that lives within me Galatians 2:19-21. He has set me free and the bible tells us that whomever the Son of God sets free will be free indeed! John 8:35-37
a. Believe we can change Phil 4:13 “I can do all things through Christ who strengthens me.” It’s not by our own strengths, but God’s Grace that we are conquerors
The purpose of this English language Arts reading and writing assignment is to find out how carefully you read and to understanding what you think about leadership and city planning..
and I am not wrong
While, 30 thousand people from thirteen villages of Idinthakarai, Kudankulam, Kuthankulli, Uvari, Kuttapulli, Kamaneri, Thomaiyarpuram, Vijayapathi, Vairavikinaru, Thillaivananthopu, Kurinjikulam, Kuduthalai, and Periyathalai have signed against the KKNPP.
And he got to hold a lobster :) the manager thought he was pretty cute, too.
10. Ben Harper "Like a King" 4:11
Po takes piano lessons and writes his first song: "Cristobalito".
1 census
Goethe's attempt to revive the Classical harmony of man and nature involves a commitment to truth as open and self-revealing.
by Debbie & Michael Shoulders (Authors) and Gijsbert van Frankenhuyzen (Illustrator)
Tweets will feature or promote:
Some things are private for a reason but if you put your life all over the Internet be prepared to deal with the consequences.
Session 8: 1 pm – 2:15 pm
Dear First Girlfriend,
* The picture above is from An Architectural Guide to Brooklyn by Francis Morrone
Richard Williams: guitars
Holy Crap! These guys actually have outdone themselves....Willie Nelson, Tom Petty AND Van Morrison! Not to mention Ben Harper, Ween, KT Tunstall, Galactic, Tragically Hip, Ray Lamontagne, Damien "Jr. Gong" Marley, The New Orleans Social Club, and the White Ghost Shivers. No wonder they get away with charging $135.
But, of course, this is the problem. Romana steals the episode and then leaves. Ward, by all accounts, hated the emotionless nature of her departure, but frankly, she’s wrong. It’s a fantastic scene, and her delivery of the line “no more orders” makes it. It’s the Problem of Susan solved - the companion who finally grows from girl sidekick to an equal who stares down the Doctor and makes him blink. In this exchange Romana upends the entire structure and logic of the show, confidently stealing the starring role out from under the Doctor. But the result is that we want to follow her, not the Doctor. She should be the protagonist, and her adventures in E-Space sound a damn sight more exciting than Tom Baker wandering around with that whiny prat in the yellow pajamas.
“You understand what you have to do?”
3 finger
surprisingly i get a lot of compliments on this hat and when i first bought it i had no idea what school it was associated with and after people finish inquiring about why i’m wearing the hat, i tell them it was on sale at wal-mart for a dollar and i don’t have to comb my hair. that’s why i wear it and it’s my favorite.
that is the vacant face of the clock
Having the freedom to explore and interpret the world in our own unique ways allows us to ‘draw’ our own conclusions. There is no ‘right’ or ‘wrong’ way to create art.
We left the bar and I followed closely behind him. We made many turns and took a detour before finally reaching the building. It was a fine building. The lobby was like an art gallery. Many art pieces were hung on the walls and one that intrigued me was a piece by Arthur J. Rodriguez. It was very different from the other pieces; holding no distinct form or anything recognizable in it. Different shades of dark blue were used and the only light colour found was the shades of grey that spread across the top. The brush stokes were stout, strong and firm. That piece brought about an unpleasant feeling, like death it self – dark and gloomy.
Lean into discomfort. I'm inspired by that idea. Oh, and the fact that I'm inspired by something? Means you should brace yourself.
Aotea Mist @ colour burn 26%
Crop-top from Guess, Shorts from H&M, Boots from Forever 21, Turban is my own from Urban Outfitters a long time ago.
“Researching my book, which covered all 462 suicide bombings around the globe, I had colleagues scour Lebanese sources to collect martyr videos, pictures and testimonials and biographies of the Hizbollah bombers. Of the 41, we identified the names, birth places and other personal data for 38. We were shocked to find that only eight were Islamic fundamentalists; 27 were from leftist political groups such as the Lebanese Communist Party and the Arab Socialist Union; three were Christians, including a female secondary school teacher with a college degree. All were born in Lebanon.
use it in a sentence or draw it for
1/2c almond flour
I am rich beyond measure.
teacher was up and signing their names by one to three strategies. With this done,
Listen up little people, growing up is not the metamorphosis you think it will be.
47For so the Lord has given us orders, saying, I have given you for a light to the Gentiles so that you may be for salvation to the ends of the earth.
The discretion to celebrate ad orientem or versus populum is exercised by the celebrant. Prudence and circumstances compel him to consider those who are touched by his decision if he is going to depart from local usage. Common sense will dictate whether the physical environment of the presbyterium and the altar place any constraints. Respect for local de facto or de iure custom demands sensitivity. Clearly, the rector of a church or the caretaker of the oratory or chapel can grant or deny access to the sacred place to all the faithful or to specific individuals based on the willingness of the persons to conform to established customs of the place. Indeed, the rector or caretaker would be obligated to deny egress to a sacred minister who bore certain ecclesiastical penalties.
The XBLA release also includes exclusive content not available for iOS, such as six tactical trials where you can put your puzzle-solving abilities to test.
Next Post: The experiment continues...
A true standoff of state and federal governments that was very close to becoming a "shooting war!" This is a time of history that I'm thinking we should study more closely.
What message does that send to IRA dissidents who have long accused Adams and his colleagues of naivety in their dealings with the British? What they will say is this: “You trusted the Brits, Gerry. You accepted their deal and their terms and now look what they are doing to you? Once they had you where they wanted you to be, they stuck the knife into you.”
“Hey, check this out,” the 14-year veteran of the Columbus Narcotics Bureau added as he leafed through the former couple’s financial paperwork. “It’s a Varsity Club receipt signed by Kirk Herbstreit! How cool is that?”
"We hope that whoever is considering this, they don't go there.
EastEnders: Pat: The End of an Era
Heat a grill or grill pan over medium-high and lightly oil hot grill. Pat fish dry with paper towels, lightly brush with oil, and season with salt and pepper. Grill fish fillets until opaque throughout, about 10 minutes, flipping once.
There is so much about this movie that has ingrained itself in the public conscious--punching carcasses, ’Yo, Adrian!” and running up the steps of Independence Hall--you know all of them even if you have never seen Rocky. If you have not, shame on you. It is a great film. You do not have to care a thing about boxing to love it.
I will have more to say.
Buffalo Soldiers Booth: Tangy flavor, well cooked, nice heat, very good.
I changed brands because New Balance is a local company and they make their shoes right in Massachusetts. The people who made my shoes probably live within 50 miles of my house and I like to think I’m helping put food on their table. How often do you get to make the choice to support local workers these days? We used to make a lot of running shoes in Massachusetts but New Balance is the only company still doing it as far as I know.
…S TX LATER TODAY/TNGT…
New York City!!! I love the city. LOVE IT! There's always something to do! I'm not afraid to explore either. I like to ride the subway, and Central Park is the best in the summer time!
Last evening from 5-8pm we held the first Encinitas Station Market farmers market in San Diego, which my friend Raquel is managing. I can not begin to tell you the amount of work that goes into opening a farmers market, let’s start with the permitting aspect, which took a year and a half! I will have more pics to show you of the amazing vendors from this market soon, as well as some of the decorative aspects of the market as I have been working in a stylist role for the market.
Savard: Well, I just thought I’d tell you.
K-Drama side note: Rooftop prince is getting more and more awesome! Can I have 20 ep’s instead of 16 please?!?!? KKTHX
CR: Tory manifesto has nothing on roads.
Last week I had the distinction of being a guest lecturer at Syracuse University. My students were mostly freshman and (someone was) paying over $50K+ per year for their “education.” I decided to lecture on the history of education in the US, and why they were paying way too much money for mostly obsolete training.
Key Levels
We had a very happy Christmas. The weather was so unbelievably mild that I thought we were in San Diego.........almost. :-)
The world will continue to do what it does, but I will pray for more eyes to be opened to the true Spirit of this season: the JOY of the birth of Jesus, the Savior of all the world.
In my experience, ants are master builders and hard workers. They power through the dull and even the most daunting of tasks. And emulating all of that is what it takes to get you through the unexpected life!
I always looked forward to my birthdays, even as an adult when it no longer meant pancakes for dinner or trips to Rye Playland. I never dreaded aging, never mourned passage of another year. And so, I celebrated September 11 with gusto--days off from work; personal spa days; six long restaurant tables pushed together to accommodate too many drunken friends. And a cake. Always a cake. With no fruit in it, just the way I like it.
1.get rowdy
and craft it as his inner self sees fit
"For KISS fans, Ace offers a rare behind-the-makeup look at the band's legendary origins including the lightning-bolt logo he designed and the outfits his mother sewed. He talks about the unspoken division within the band - he and Peter Criss versus Paul Stanley and Gene Simmons - because the other two didn't 'party every day.' Ace also reveals the inside story behind his turbulent breakup with KISS, their triumphant reunion a decade later, and his smash solo career. Along the way, he shares wild stories about dancing at Studio 54 with 'The Bionic Woman,' working as a roadie for Jimi Hendrix, and bar-flying all night with John Belushi. In the end, he comes to terms with his highly publicized descent into alcohol, drugs and self-destruction - ultimately managing to conquer his demons and come out on top."
I talked about lagers, how they get so little respect, and how I hoped people would take advantage of the great stuff Penn laid down. They were, no fear! We wrapped up, people were happy, and...it was time to go. Actually, it was earlier than I'd thought, so on the way out of town, I slipped over to Piper's Pub (missed it on the way in, right?) and got a pint of Helltown Insidious IPA on cask -- natch, that's why I went to Piper's, for their great cask ale! Got into a whisky conversation with the folks next to me, had a great dish of curry for the road (hadn't had anything to eat since DeLuca's...didn't need anything!), tried samples of two meads from Laurel Highlands (Bochet and Traditional)...I just don't think I'm a mead guy, like I'm not a tequila guy (or, I'm starting to think, a pinot noir guy). They were okay, but didn't really set me on fire. The Insidious did, by the way: quite tasty and snappy, and in beautiful condition.
29th January 2012
Fail. It just turned almost a reddish color. Once you apply the vinegar, I guess it stains the wood for good.
Since I'm the last person that you get to visit I will remind you to leave everyone some love to win a chance at some blog candy! There are 3 different sets of hidden goodies among the participants and just to get you salivating, this is just one of the prizes involved ;)
Joel Lane – All Dead Years
I love this month's palette. I used a lot of pretties such as the DA frame, which I painted with Distress Ink, Twinkling H2Os and Magical Micas from Lindy's.
The key in self-education and in the education of your children is to find an appropriate text that accurately addresses not only the Church's contributions but also refutes the errors of modern economics, including Communion and Socialism.
So our bishops are continuing to say we need legislation
Yield: 8–12 servings
Mugabe gave a two-and-a-half-hour-long keynote address which took the conference into the night.
1 plank
In an interview with IGN – just days after he left Eat Sleep Play – Jaffe claims he is unaware of any plans for DLC and doubts there ever will be in the future.
O.O.T.P. Towers rocked on its foundations today as news came in that the Headpress Foundation had agreed to an interview with arguably the world’s premier purveyor of strangeness’n'esoterica: snuffologist Dave Kerekes…
Sam: "I don't mind being a 33% shareholder in the corporation that is fatherhood."
I had to do a post today, 7dp3dt. It's tradition!
Chapter 2 begins not with a whimper but a bang. The bang of crocodile jaws clamping shut. On Halflings. Crocodiles, you may ask? Why yes, of course, they are my specialty. But let us begin at the beginning, where it will all become clear. The previous four weeks saw our band of doughty heroes arrive on the scene and begin doing what player characters do best: making corpses then looting them. One thing became pretty clear by the second or third encounter: the challenges were not up to the level of skill and determination of our adventurers. In other words, it was a cake walk. I cry no crocodile tears for the troubles I decided to impose on the adventurers, after all, we came here to kick butt and take names, not to beat stuffed animals with nerf bats. Prior to this weeks festival of bloodletting, I warned the players that we were taking it up a notch. The players heartily agreed, and so my diabolical plan was hatched.
HB 1043 has many supporters as cockfighting, like bull fighting, is a pretty bloody sport. Under this bill there will be penalties for things such as being a spectator, having cock fighting equipment (like slashers or gaffs), charging money for watching, or leasing/operating a “facility” for cockfighting. Some people want even tougher laws that parallel dog fighting laws.
Characters in books mirror real life people. We all have our own individual idiosyncrasies, flaws, shortcomings and insecurities. So it’s nothing unusual if characters reflects these traits. Actually this quality (imperfection) lends reality to a character. Readers find it easy to identify with someone who is imperfect, who makes mistakes and is swayed by emotions and prone to mood swings; they feel a sense of similarity when they encounter such characters.
Scallops will never be my thing, no matter how fresh they are, how well they’ve been prepared, and how many times I try them. Figs, radishes, mayonnaise – still disgusting, as well. (Which, did I mention I hate mayonnaise? I did? Oh, good.) Sometimes, a certain food just won’t do it for you. And it’s okay. Just move on to the next one.
Your name is true.
How you approach situations determines how difficult you will make them.
He wasn't fat and jolly,
Thank you so much to my awesome Guest DT girls, you've blown me away.
The high point, of course, was hitting #84 in Amazon’s paid store with SECTOR C. I’ll be talking about those glory days – er, hours – for a long time to come. So you might want to steer clear of me if you see me in the hall unless you’re ready to be subjected to all that obnoxiousness.
Changes to Illinois law often begin with something known as a shell bill, which usually alters one word or date in a specific article and section of the code. Shell bills are a type of placeholder that allows lawmakers to make more substantive changes later in the session, often without scrutiny.
He continued speaking rubbing the backs of my hands with his thumbs telling me of his feelings. How he had been terrified not knowing what became of me. He didn't understand why I hadn't come to him. He felt betrayed that I had gone to our friend first. He was glad that I could find some peace talking with our friend but he wanted to be that person for me.
Plot Summary: Cullen Witter’s summer before his senior year is marked by two events: a possible sighting of the long-thought-extinct Lazarus Woodpecker and the disappearance of Cullen’s 15-year-old brother Gabriel. As his small town of Lily, Arkansas becomes more obsessed with the possibility of the woodpecker, Cullen becomes increasingly angry and disillusioned about the lack of interest in his brother’s disappearance. Cullen Witter is a suspicious, sarcastic seventeen-year-old who works at a gas station, fills his journal with the titles of books he might write (“Book Title #73: You May Feel a Slight Sting”) and hopes to someday leave his hometown of Lily, which “was like Arkansas’s version of a black hole; nothing could escape it.” Meanwhile, while Cullen struggles to keep his family together, on the other side of the world, an eighteen-year-old missionary named Benton Sage decides that spreading the Good Word is no longer for him, and returns home to his father’s great disappointment and rage. Benton trades his Bible for a textbook and enrolls in college, but his father still can’t forgive him. Unable to deal with his father’s disappointment, Benton commits a shocking act, setting into motion a series of events that eventually lead to readers into the mystery of Gabriel’s disappearance. The two stories seem completely separate from each other, but they aren’t, and as the book comes to a gripping conclusion, readers will see just how small this world can be.
1 hypertrophic
Organized Noah's room - check!! YAY!!!!!
The "Deciding the Course: Parensts' Roles in Impacting Department of Education Decisions" turned out to be quite a success! Thank you to all the parents that took the time to lend their voice to the event, and to Zakiyah Ansari, from the Alliance of Quality Education.
Is your house ever messy? Yep.
DW: Hmmm.
I really liked this book as a winter escape. The pictures are gorgeous and although I don't see Brian building this chicken coop for me, there are some ideas in there worth considering.
CDC Certified Dope.
These shoes were samples so they do have small flaws, but otherwise they're wonderful. The black beauties exceeded my expectations on quality, since the faux leather feels sturdy and they're surprisingly comfy! The skull laced shoes aren't as practical as their black sisters, but those details are to die for. I was surprised to find the print's quality better than I expected, but I still might leave these sweeties home on wild party nights or downpour days.
After Anna died, I wrote this. And everything that I wrote there still holds true. Anna was such a genuinely GOOD person, and a fiercely loyal friend. If you look up the definition of the word "loyal" in the dictionary, her picture should be there. Her death opened up my eyes to a lot of things, mainly the way I act and treat people. I had vowed to become a better person after losing her. I wanted to stay in touch with people more and be a better friend to people and I have to sadly say, that I didn't succeed at that goal. I know I'm not a bad person, but I didn't make much more of an effort to stay in touch with people and I had wanted to. I wasn't always there for my friends and I should have been. It makes me wonder how Anna did it so easily. Being nice and being "good" just came so naturally to her. Aside from the fact that losing any person so young is a tragedy, its also such a tragedy that the world lost a person who was so "good".
Drink good beer instead. Make sure the beer has 'MO' soemwhere within in and pledge to donate the value of those beers to a Men's Health charity like Beyond Blue or Prostate Cancer Foundation or directly to a mate who is doing the real Movember.
Then the entertainment begins! There were about 50-75 members of the UT Longhorn band there and they started up with a rousing version of …T-E-X-A-S. Only to be followed a host of others you’re all familiar with if you ever been to at UT sporting event.
Morgen: Are you on any forums or networking sites? If so, how valuable do you find them?
November 24 – Turkey Trot 5K, Amelia Island, FL 28:13 (5K Personal Record!)
Christopher Plummer as The Emperor
You're cozy and warm in your bed, my dear
Well, sometimes the line can be blurred. Something can be both an e-book and e-tutorial and something can be both an e-book and an e-pictorial. Something can also be both an e-pictorial and a video. Something can also be an e-tutorial, e-pictorial, and an e-class all in one. The lines are blurred and it can be confusing.
I’ve watched a lot of television, I’ve made a lot of predictions and I’ve been right a lot and wrong a lot. Never before however, has a show messed with my predictions as much as Homeland did. At the end of one episode, I was positive that Brody was a traitor but at the end to he next episode, I’ve positive he’s not. The trend continued for most of the season, keeping me constantly analytical of every scene Brody was in. This inability to form a consistent prediction is what makes Homeland truly great television. Watch, analyze it and pay attention to when you’re positive if Brody is a traitor or not.
Of course, things would be easier if Arthur was not so far from her image of the ideal boyfriend. Let’s face it: he’s arrogant, he’s snob, he discards women like toys and he bends to his father’s heartless commands without a protest. At least he's... Well, hot. And with her family’s charity foundation under financial scrutiny, Arthurs is also the only one who can help her to save the boy’s life.
Although.
Of course, it's nothing so vulgar as a simple list of who to ignore. It's slightly - but only slightly - more subtle than that:
I've had this recipe with me for a while now and every time I looked at it , I postponed the idea. That day seemed to be perfect to make them because I wanted something really good and at the same time I didn't want my sink to be filled with vessels. So I set out to make a batch of one bowl brownies.
Moffatt’s book wasn’t bad (and how can I call the text of the gospels—even rearranged—bad!). I can certainly see how it provides an important service to people who otherwise might not pick up a bible. But its service is that of the crutch—it can get you by, but is no substitute for real legs. The gospels are the real legs.
I love the last bridge going to this:
Hooray - we have a new place. It's bigger, it's better, it's fabulously wonderful and we're moving this weekend. And...get this... it's only four doors down. We saw it last week and when I saw the two large palm trees and the manicured garden in the front I just KNEW it was going to be home. And now it will be.
Easter is literally 2 days away and I'm still scrambling to get these cupcakes done. I've been meaning to do them last Wednesday but then end-of-the-year projects came and I couldn't find any time. I've seen these cupcakes done over and over but I haven't found one with a nest made out of spun sugar. I saw these sugar crowns in Martha Stewart's "Cupcakes" and thought they would make perfect nests. Great Idea but a terrible method.
Cargo
Total passengers and crew, 2,180.
4 kept
According to Texas AgriLife Extension Service economists, this historic drought has led to a record $5.2 billion in agricultural losses, making it the most costly drought on record. Dr. David Anderson, Texas AgriLife Extension livestock economist says that Texas will probably lose 600,000 momma cows this year alone due to the drought. “Livestock losses include the increased cost of feeding due to lack of pastures and ranges and market losses,” Anderson said. “Market losses include the impact of fewer pounds sold per calf and the impact of lower market prices due to the large number of cattle sold in a very short time period.” Livestock losses have reached $2.06 billion and lost hay production is surpassing the $750 million mark. Forage is now worth more today than it has ever been.
ba-dum tish!
Late Stage Products 12
2: SHIRLEY & LEE - Shirley Come Back To Me
About a year ago I wrote an article entitled How to use the Obihai OBi100 or OBi110 VoIP device as a gateway between Asterisk/FreePBX and Google Voice and/or the OBiTALK network and followed it up with How to use the Obihai OBi100 or OBi110 VoIP device as a gateway between Asterisk/FreePBX and Google Voice and/or the OBiTALK network — Part 2: Using the Phone port as an Asterisk extension. The problem with those articles was that although the method I used worked, it was pretty cumbersome to implement, and a lot of folks either couldn’t get it working, or they had issues with it. Now that I have a shiny new OBi202 courtesy of the fine folks at Obihai Technology, Inc., I decided to take another whack at this project and have developed what I believe is a simplified approach. You’ve already seen half of it if you read this article (and if you haven’t, you’ll need to refer back to it, so keep it open in a browser tab):
I can tell she is thinking of lying but says: ‘No. The whole thing is so silly, don’t you think?’
There is the massive central building at the site, that was once a palace but there are also areas all around that look like your general suburban street. We discovered that they actually are regular houses where the Beefeater's and their families live. Pretty cool I think. I wonder what their addresses are. 13 Offwithherhead lane, Tower of London? The Beefeater's are actually pretty cool. I expected them to be more like the guards, just wandering around being all stern and serious, but they are really great at chatting to the kids, stopping for photos and one tried his best to humour Stella out of a foul mood. It didn't work.
Hypothesis / Theory — what I think is being done:
- Not sure if this makes sense, but the shoe sort of moulds to your feet after a couple of uses. Although I didn’t really have to ‘break them in’ but the arch support, which felt a bit rigid at first, softened and the toe area seem to have widened a bit? Basically the more I used it, the better it fits and aides my running form.
Heat oil in a large pot. Add onions and peppers; cook until onions are translucent. Add garlic and cook until fragrant. Stir in flour. Add water and half-and-half. Bring to a boil. Reduce heat to a simmer and cook for 10 minutes. Using an immersion blender, puree this mixture until it is smooth (if using a regular blender, work in batches, filling the pitcher only half-full, since the liquid will be hot). Slowly add cheeses to warm pureed mixture, making sure all cheese is melted before adding more. (If the cheese isn't melting, return the pot to low heat and stir constantly.) Once cheese is completely melted, add salt, lemon pepper, sugar, mustard, vinegar and Tabasco. Stir to combine.
She spoke to five people.
Next up: day 90 of my P90X/P90X+ Hybrid!
He was not interested but the temptation to spend some time with her was over powering.
I have been off all anti-seizure meds since about the time we came home form the hospital after his surgery almost 3 1/2 months. I have had no seizures since the very last one in mid Aug. 2010 when I was admitted to the hospital 30 min. away and they figured out what was wrong with me and how to work towards getting it fixed and they put me on heavy doses of PIC line antibiotics for almost a month.
1- You’re supposed to go to something you’ve written (be in WIP or already published) and then post something to do with 7’s. Either your 77th or 7th page, then a 7th paragraph, or line 7, followed by 7 sentences or lines. Your choice of formatting will affect this, but…
RICHARD HOWITT MEP
2010 (Reporters Without Borders, 6/16/10). Nobody has been arrested
Sprinkle chopped parsley on top of the vegetable dip for a garnish to add some color on top.
But I am sooo ready to be seen, my back hurt… my stress level is too the roof because I am making sure the machines dont interfere with my mom’s pace maker, my son isnt getting the stem’s placed in the wrong spot and my aunt is getting all of her treatments, regardless if this is her first time there……. Jared makes me feel better all the time and he sees that I am ready to LEAVE without being seen because the office is very busy ( which is a good thing…it shows the doctors are good too ) so he takes a moment to make me laugh……
3 Sweet Dixie 3:50
These 9 pound 3 foot long rats, not to be confused with dirty lowdown no good for nothing rats in Mafia movies, are called Gambian rats. (no, again, they were not named after the N.Y. mafia Gambino crime family either) At least I don’t think they were. Might wanna research that one and let me know.
02/02/2012 BUY 0.02 euraud 1.22658 02/10/2012 1.23521 +15.74
By taking advantage of new technology, Earhart was able to grow his operation to 150 registered Angus cows. In 1970, he began using artificial insemination, and ultrasound technology in 1995.
At the other end of scale, Barnet & Camden had an epic BF of 24.5, and Brent & Harrow's was 21.6.
The shower is going to be in a side room at a restaurant not far from me. I'm sure there is a time limit to the room's use so I don't know if games will be played or not. I'm hearing of more and more women who don't like, maybe even detest, shower games. I don't like them if they cause the event to drag on needlessly, but in general I like them. It isn't about winning prizes, I just like games and puzzles. How about you?
and they are probably the same Prospect Park Muckettey Mucks that miss the point… even with their “Food Truck”
The Bill Sir Winston referred to was not ready until June, two months after he had to retire because of his health. His successor Anthony Eden was an internationalist who told Conservative Cyril Osborne in the House of Commons, “There is no question of any action being taken to control immigration and in any case most were from Eire.” Then in November Eden’s Cabinet ceased discussion of immigration.
My young computer Padawan was asking me questions about older computers today showing off his new voluminous A+ certification study guide.
He pointed at Sally,
Thought I would share a cute easel Halloween card I made I love this gravestone stamp, so disappointed that it has been retired.
Proof that God desired to institute the Sacrament of the Holy Eucharist. We need but recall that it is the nature of goodness to communicate itself to others. The greater the good, the greater the tendency to be diffused to others. St. Paul wished to be anathema for those he wished to save. This being the case, what shall we say of infinite goodness? As God is a greater good beyond compare than all created good, greater also is His desire to make all things good and holy as He is Himself. God wants to make us like Himself and to communicate His gifts according according to the capacity of our nature. So Our Lord seeks all those who withdraw from Him and begs them not to abandon Him. Not content with this, He tenderly tolerates those who delay in their coming, inviting them with His promises and luring them with His gifts. Therefore, what is more in conformity with infinite goodness than to have instituted a sacrament so powerful that it makes us share in His sanctity and goodness?
It is up to the government to decide if the individual is a “terrorist” or not even though there is no direct evidence against the individual. For example, a father and son had been convicted of terrorism charges and they were placed on the no-fly lists in the U.S. while they were both in Pakistan. They were striped from the American soil unless they agreed to talk to the FBI in Islamabad. The reports stated that there was no direct evidence linking the father and the son to any terrorism activities, but being convicted of being terrorists made them “guilty enough” to be separated and listed as dangerous (Fear and No-Fly Listing in Canada, Werbin, pg. 618).
I log on to Skype every morning and this morning it seems my Skype interface has changed a little… Okay not so bad I’ll take some time to squizz through that later (she thinks to herself).
10. In the Dark
527.
If any of you have a personal working relationship with any School Board Member, I would encourage you to make a special point to contact them and encourage them to support rejecting the replacement by-law. Admittedly by the Administration, there has been no problem with the current by-law and it has served the board well. At a minimum, please encourage board members to support the removal of the above three items. This will allow whoever is President of the Board the authority to silence the voice of anyone that would like to address the Board if he or she does not want to hear what anyone has to say. (Censorship?) I thought that we lived in America where we enjoyed “Freedom of Speech”. How does the proposed bylaw language align with what we teach our students about Freedom of Speech?
I wanna take snap shots of you from every
I am all for fiscal responsibility. Way for it. And one of the things I always expected the Republicans to do would be to watch my nation’s pocketbook, maybe even too much. ("So you’ve been out of work and you can’t feed your family? Too bad, maggot!") Yet, the Neocons believed only in tax cuts; they never met a spending bill they didn’t like, domestic or foreign. Unless it was against their religious beliefs, of course. And you know what? The party faithful bought it. So long as “their guy” was spending the money, deficits didn’t matter (remember Dick Cheney saying that exact quote?) and it all went to things the faithful liked…like faith-based initiatives, a two-front war, and “No Child Left Behind.” Ok, NCLB became an unfunded mandate that bankrupted the education budget of several states, but you get the point.
The goats, now milked and free to wander out and about for the day, come over to investigate, and nudge them a bit with their nose. The lambs pay them no attention. The geese go by, the chickens pop in, the dog nips in and out and the sheep stand outside and stare. The lambs ignore the lot of them.
Anyone who knows me knows I’m a sucker for renovation. In fact, the channel my TV is most often tuned to is HGTV. Monday night a new breed of home improvement show will be born as HGTV travels the country searching for huge HGTV fans ready to knock down some walls. Yes. I’ve already applied. You?
J: Uuuhh because we have snow outside and we get to go out and play in it? (This kid cracks me up!)
What unravels from there is a well-written foray into the dangerous world of poison, where even human emotions can kill. Jessamine is a rather predicable heroine - attached to her lover from first sight, and at times, a bit naive - but quite tolerable. I was relieved to see the author did not model Weed after the increasingly annoying Edward Cullen; he stands on his own as a boy both burdened and blessed by his gift, as well as a
I turn over, away from the blinking fascia, I arch my back as I untangle myself from the covers which hold my emaciated, aching body. A “click” sound rings through my skull as the bones in my neck grind against one another. Emitting a sound like that of a paving slab being dragged across concrete, my shoulder blades flex and jostle for space under the taut, tight skin which lays across them. They protrude hugely, looking like chiselled stumps on a back which once held wings.
P.P.S- For extra inspiration, check out RuPaul's latest video! I know she isn't at all Himegyaru but she's so amazing and inspirational I can't help it ;-;
Naik’s statements are laden with errors. First, there were not twelve disciples when Jesus prayed in John 17 but eleven since Judas had already left to betray Jesus. Besides, Jesus himself said he wasn’t praying for Judas:
- Favorite Cabaret experience as a performer/prostaffer?
In this day and age, forget about ever seeing anything that can honestly be called original. You think you've seen something brand new that no one else has done, thought of or said? You haven't; you've just never seen it before then.
To perform the job successfully, an individual must demonstrate the following values:
How might you play a bit with humor's sparkle at your Christmas gathering?
It only takes 10 minutes to prepare this meal and it makes your home smell delicious while it cooks!
And what if a thousand sleepless nights
When I started blogging, I was in a relationship with a woman that I loved dearly. However, the relationship was unfulfilling for us both as we never seemed able to find time for each other. There were other issues, however, it came down to the simple fact that neither of us were truly getting what we wanted or needed in a relationship.
She said nothing, but reached out her hand to him. Then he gave her a kiss and led her outside, lifted her onto his horse, and took her to the royal palace where their wedding was celebrated with great joy.
1) make the reservation before you go as it is always full house
My survival was the result of planning, discipline and luck. I planned what I was going to eat and drink. I was disciplined enough not to throw caution completely to the wind. And I was lucky that some of my trigger foods were not in any of the suites.
Tanya
SOMETIMES IT'S OK TO BE A FOLLOWER I picked this one to go above my Followers/Google Friend Connect Links. It looks a little sad and lonely over there, since I don't have any followers yet, but I hope you'll follow this blog :-)
Beck leveled it at the engineer’s head. What remaining color Claypool had in his face quickly washed away as he stared wide-eyed into the end of the barrel. “You’ll draw, Claypool, or we’ll end this little lottery right now.”
These are all my own claimed musings, of course. It will never happen. Nintendo are appreciative of themselves; and they should be, as they are currently assertive both the animate and carriageable gaming markets. However, their success has arise at a price. They accept absent abounding abeyant sales and licenses due to the acumen of their audience. Conceivably a rebrand may be what Nintendo needs to anamnesis the "hardcore" gamers, abounding or whom accept confused on to the PlayStation 3 and/or Xbox 360. It formed for Disney. Con Air, Clerks, the Scream trilogy,... These are all Disney movies. Maybe the next acknowledgment to Halo or Admirable Theft Auto could be a Nintendo game, beneath a altered name.
For the construction sector, the March JOLTS data indicate a significant decline in hiring, falling from 318,000 hires in February to 286,000 in March. However, the February number was upwardly revised, and it is possible the decline in March was due to accelerated hiring in February due to unusually warm weather for much of the nation. Nonetheless, March was the first month in over a year for which the level of hiring for the construction sector fell below 300,000.
So forever we can sing.
April 27th, 10 1/2 weeks I believe we went to the perinatologist, Dr. Halvorsen. I feel like he is very knowledgeable, and watching me closely for the potential dangers I have read up on all these years. I think they didn't give me an ultrasound pic that first time (or at least I can't find it). Everything looked good though, except they saw a small cyst on the umbilical cord. They wanted to keep any eye on it because sometimes they see that in the early weeks and it means nothing, but if it continues to be there later it could be an indication of chromosomal abnormalities.
The second law under attack is the Renewable Energy Standard (RES) that mandates monopoly utilities produce 15% of electric generation from renewable energy sources by 2021. Voters passed this law in 2008 as Prop C.
In a restaurant window.
spring remodeling fever. Remodeling your home is a great way to give it
We strongly recommend that if you cannot productively en­gage with naysayers, you should ignore them. If you engage with them in a non-productive way (denying their validity, calling them names), you can do way more harm than good.
All this nonsense started like this:
There were many lovely quilts but these are my TOP TEN PICKS! So pour yourself a coffee and enjoy the show…
As you know I have been raising money to go on a missions trip to Panama this summer! I feel like a brat when I say this, but I have never really had to worry about finances in my life. I am definitely not rich, but I have been blessed with parents who have been willing to pay for college and help support me along the way. When I stepped into this trip and the finances that came with it, I told myself that I don’t want my parents having to pick up the scraps of what I don’t raise. I wanted to raise this money on my own. It was something that I knew I didn’t want to put on them. I sent out many support letters and was really stoked to see what God was going to do. It became prevalent very soon that raising this money was going to be a huge trial. I realized soon that this was not going to be as easy as I thought it would be. This has been by far the most expensive missions trip I’ve been on, which became very overwhelming. I got money here and there and was so thankful but began to grow impatient. I got the idea to make cake pop and sell them for donations which was a huge success! Everybody loved them, and through selling them dorm room to dorm room God really was working on opening me up and getting me to step out of my comfort zone. It was hard and definitely a push for me to do that but so rewarding in the end. God really helped me and pushed me.
I do apologize for not posting something amazing the last few days. Hopefully you’ll fall in love with the band I have for you today. Today I present, The Good Natured. They hail from the UK. The band consist of Sarah McIntosh – lead vocals, her brother Hamish McIntosh – bass, and George Hinton – drums. Their music falls under electropop, with a dark edge.
Day 9 - Sencha blouse from a couple of years ago, worn with an ancient Monsoon skirt and charity shopped cardigan.
1. Boneless skinless chicken breasts, $1.19/lb. at El Rancho Supermercado (through 11/30/10)
Harvey EB, Boice JD, Honeyman M, Flannery JF. Prenatal X-ray exposure and childhood cancer in twins. N Engl J Med 1985; 312: 541-545.
Faust
These and many other examples remind us that Animism is real and the consequences of dedicating a nation to ancestral spirits are very serious. The Scriptures are clear: "You shall not... practise divination or soothsaying... give no regard to mediums and familiar spirits; do not seek after them, to be defiled by them; I am the Lord your God." Leviticus 19:26, 31
Bonus: Fill others with courage by having fun. Work-only-leaders don’t build up they drag down. Lift up by lightening up. Good humor powerfully expresses courage as long as it’s not perceived as being out of touch or hiding from the truth.
I remember the first time last year I played volleyball, the morning after I seriously had trouble just getting off my futon to get to the bathroom and took serious consideration of giving up playing. This time, I did loose most games and I went home drenched in sweat. But the morning after was just a tiny bit sore, not much at all. Also a new perspetive that although I wasn’t playing my best I have more confidence that my skills will return in short order. I’ve always played for just the enjoyment of playing it anyway.
Wakened from dreams
You have heard me profess my love for Need to Breathe plenty of times before. By far one of my all time favorites. They have a new album that just came out called "The Reckoning". This band is definitely southern rockish with songs that definitely have some Jesus loving undertones without being in your face. Awesome as always!
The woman who made her mistakes, and forgave herself.
But the undisputed fact is, under Thaksin, the gap between the rich and poor Thais, which had steadily rose over decades as a result of the Washington Consensus style of economic development, narrowed for the first time in Thailand’s history, mainly because of the Thaksin’s populous policies.
rapidshare.com:
i am Love in search of a body
Now I appreciate that some people do not want to hear a guy singing his little heart out on the bus first thing in the morning, especially if he can’t hold a note. But there is no need to throw things at him and be generally horrid. We live in the 21st century where we’re supposed to be accepting, kind, understanding people who look on ourselves and our community with this attributes. I can’t see that from this video. I have to be honest that I stopped watching about 1.17 as I suddenly felt so sorry for the guy and ashamed at myself for laughing at his videos. Does laughing at the videos make me just as bad as the clowns who were throwing things at him?
Here's a story from the front page of the May 12, 1977 edition of the BARNESVILLE ENTERPRISE in Barnesville, Ohio. I'm not sure why they used my photo for this story. I was not the "famed magician". Maybe someone at the paper just liked my photo better than the other ones in the press kit. Needless to say I was kind of pleased to my photo on the front page of the paper.
10.Vontade de Matar
Eat and have a happy Saint Patrick's Day!
Jungle Hijinks architecture kit Beat Donkey Kong at Boscage Hijinks
Baby Allen lives near his Grandparent's farm so Tracy asked that include bright colors and possibly barn yard animals, tractors, and a barn. After a little googling, I found the perfect fabric; Farm Friends by Jamie Wood.
Stephen Derbyshire
One hundred years ago, suffragettes fought for women to have the vote. At the time, women were considered little more than chattel. Have we changed? You be the judge....
I was leading up to something in reply to this but jumped up to the next point.
Pegi Young: vocals
One particular noteworthy innovation is the term/universal life (UL) combo that is hitting the marketplace. These products were created primarily in response to the reserve requirements for level premium term, as well as the pressure to have marketable yet competitive term pricing. Simply put, reserving requirements for UL products are less than term and allow carriers to offer “term-like” products that cost less.
The shirt is another of my travel tee collection- I took the tee, cut the arms off and hemmed them, made a casing in the neck on the front and back of the shirt and strung a ribbon through to make a bow.
Risk factors for heart attack: We know that there are some factors that may increase the risk of a person having chest pain that may be related to the heart. Some of those can be: previous heart attack, previously diagnosed stroke, history of smoking (especially recent), high blood pressure, diabetes, high cholesterol or family history of heart attacks.
This book still has a couple jokes that will go over the heads of the intended readers like Mixed-Up Files, but I think she made the vocabulary a little easier this time around by explaining most of the more difficult words she uses in context.
Oh, and by the way, I’m fifty-four. Life didn’t end at fifty and neither did my passion for writing.
My very first love was books. As a little girl I hauled books home from our small local library by the wagon load. The primary pleasure of my childhood was reading. I spent hours and hours laying on my bed reading, surrounded by a muddle of books. This is still the kind of muddle I like best.
"Yeah, I see what you mean," I say, "he's not much to look at is he?"
Beyond that, there would be the means of achieving this. These would be to provide the best service at the lowest cost and ideally gain a good reputation. And I honestly did not see why this could not be exactly the same in every single business on the globe. A salesman, a hospital, a bank, a school, a pro-wrestler… pretty much everyone but a fraudster or a grave robber would need to follow some version of these basic rules. And even the grave robber would need someone to sell all the gold fillings to.
Song of the Day: "Just In Love" - Joe Jonas.... It's just FUN! Enjoy!
Many times during the run negative thoughts tried to worm there way in, wanting me to just walk for a few minutes. This is where having my goals helped me so much. Just by saying "no no walking" I was able to push on and stay on pace. I believe running is 80% mental and my mind will tell me to stop before my body will.
I was so chuffed when I was named a finalist, but then seeing who my fellow finalists were I did then realise that this wasn't about winning this was about celebration. I love that we all got through to the finals, because all of us are about family fun and its not just one aspect, I think between us we pretty much have the market sewn up!
9. Autodrop. The pink/purple Cadillacs, as I don't like liquorice. Do not give me a box of those as I will empty it.
On a hilltop between the two towns, commanding views of only partly re-landscaped industrial waste, surrounding works, terraces and hills that would be crammed with sightseers were they elsewhere, is a memorial to NHS founder Aneurin Bevan. It's the most striking tectonic thing in the area, although it goes back to the very foundations of architecture. It is a stone circle, in the place where he used to speak to constituents. It feels moving, mystical, an ancient monument to the belief in a viable future. We were there on the NHS' 63rd birthday.
Jerome: But when He says, “They will reverence my Son,” He does not speak as in ignorance. For what is there that this householder (by whom in this place God is intended) knows not? But God is thus spoken of as being uncertain, in order that free-will may be reserved for man.
Britain needs creative, enterprising and innovative people with the ideas and the drive to change and improve things. But those individuals cannot realise their dreams on their own: they need other people to help them get their ideas to market. And those other people form the teams without which entrepreneurs cannot be successful; and the most effective teams are organised along co-operative lines.
September 21, 2010.
I cannot express how much I love my son, how proud I am of him, how I long for this to be over and for him to be home and safe. The only thing I can do is pray, and fill those boxes up with things that tell him how much he is loved. If it is too much stuff, I am certain he can share with all the guys.
Rich, compelling writing will keep the pages turning in this riveting and tautly told psychological thriller.
Mahek: – Yes, it was really long. Some 11 months. We last met at the alumni meet.
I mean…I had friends. People liked me. I was the life of the party.
We were told not to cry and make a fuss when it was time to go. That we didn't want our last experience with the boys to be one of anxiety and confusion for them.
p115 “It is simply a matter of engrossing yourself in Mu so totally that there is no room for thoughts of any kind, including Mu itself.”
We got five 10 ft boards of 1x4's, and five 6 ft of 1x2 boards. They didn't have the 1x2's in the 10ft size, otherwise we just would've gotten 2 of those and one 6 ft board. The 1x4's were for the back and the bottom, and the 1x2's were for the front.
Being totally green to house buying we went along and arranged finance for around what the real estage agent thought the property would go for, we were so naive in this that we gave no leeway if bidding were to go higher...haha....hindsight (sigh)....anyhow along to the auction we went, with our limit no higher than what we had organised and as you might guess, the bidding got there within a matter of seconds!!!
I absolutely do not regret it.
Something hidden away
Look, in the box
First, we got pretty slow a couple of weeks ago and I think I was driving poor Bob crazy with my cabin fever. He eagerly suggested I go visit my daughter and three granddaughters who live in Teague, Texas. After all, we had not seen them since mid December. Lily is now almost 18 months old and Katelyn (5 1/2 years) had another ear infection and was very sick and wanting her Nana. Who could say no to that?
Start linking up your recipes....
That glares back at me
- designs practical tools for institutions, individuals and companies wishing to combat corruption
when he has learned to harness the lightning,
Good for you Jen, for speaking truth and running to the light.
Many Germans, even, look askance at you if you say your family comes from Silesia - perhaps because of a pain they can't deal with. And I do wonder why people can't deal with what is, after all, simple historical truth? Silesia was my mother's birthplace, and my family's home. Now other people live there and it's their home. I totally accept that, but the country is nevertheless part of my identity. Why should I pretend otherwise?
96. Eye of God ^
If you buy some of it, I would love to see how you use it. That would mean so much to me! Just link it here on this post. Thanks again everyone for your support. Click on the picture to go to scrapbook.com
Why are we supposed to get Brazilians? Should you get Botox? Do men secretly hate us? What should you call your vagina? Why does your bra hurt? And why does everyone ask you when you’re going to have a baby?
Best Theatre Choreographer PETER DARLING for Matilda The Musical at the Cambridge
Also not surprising that this ever-increasing shrinkage of the world is being driven in part by the digital world in which we all live. I think for the first time in my life, I can say “Duh!” to something I read in the New York Times: “The research underscores the growing power of the emerging science of social networks.” Wow. I think Lolcats could’ve figured that one out.
Anna Mae Routledge ... Celeste Jeansen
a cracked mirror, mirror
I knew it had been a long, hard day in the kitchen yesterday when I finally got home, looked in the mirror and saw that I had cake batter dried to the side of my face!
...I think I could blog a bit.
On Saturday I'll be posting the first of 3 days of Previews for the Waltzingmouse May Release - Claire has 3 lovely sets coming out this month. Previews will be May 5th, 6th and 7th and the release will be on Tuesday May 8th! You won't want to miss it!
I used these beautiful sweet/tart apples from Ha's Apple Farm (available at many So Cal farmer's markets). Ina's recipe calls for Granny Smith apples, but these worked fine and were delicious.
In such a regrettable scenario, they’d have to pay for everything independently. They’d have to pay for each and every thing burgled and its installment charges also. Using this method, they would end up paying for just about every service and object two times. Quite possibly, they might need to pay higher this time around as the expense of everything goes up almost every other day.
230 4. “Bork on Bork.” Book Review: Robert H. Bork, The Tempting of America (New York, 1989). Northwestern University Law Review, vol. 84, pp. 1142-66 (1990).
I know that many Jews have a bad view of Christianity. Most of that is the fault of us Christians. Many horrible things have been done to Jews in the name of Christianity. However, these things which were done in the name of Christ, were not done in accordance with the commandments of Jesus Christ. I hope that everyone reading this blog, Jew or Gentile, will take the time to read the New Testament and learn who the real Jesus is.
The movie is probably one of the greatest horror movies of time. You’re going to want to watch this movie over and over again! I can watch this movie a million times and it never gets old! This movie has the greatest surprise ending ever! Your jaw is going to drop!
Jimmy Fallon (Late Night with Jimmy Fallon) (WINNER)
(Draw me away!) The Bride desires the Lord to draw her by His Holy Spirit. She knows He is the only one that can cause her heart to run after Him. And she is fervent about it. She wants that intimacy with the Lord…. to be consumed with Him, with His love. Have you asked the Lord to consume you? He will if your heart is sincere. But don’t be surprised at the way He answers that prayer, because if you are sincere, He will take away anything and everything that keeps Him from being first in your heart. He is a jealous God, and will not take second place in His Bride’s life. He must be first, and her agenda must be the same as His. He wants His bride to be one with Him. The trademark of a true bride is complete union with her husband.
First Earflap:
Capitalism should not be condemned, since we haven’t had capitalism. A system of capitalism presumes sound money, not fiat money manipulated by a central bank. Capitalism cherishes voluntary contracts and interest rates that are determined by savings, not credit creation by a central bank. It’s not capitalism when the system is plagued with incomprehensible rules regarding mergers, acquisitions, and stock sales, along with wage controls, price controls, protectionism, corporate subsidies, international management of trade, complex and punishing corporate taxes, privileged government contracts to the military-industrial complex, and a foreign policy controlled by corporate interests and overseas investments. Add to this centralized federal mismanagement of farming, education, medicine, insurance, banking and welfare. This is not capitalism!
Bristle have releases on Havoc (The System 7"), Beer City (Inner Conflict 7") and Ransom Note (Won't Die For You LP).
…Because Dan wanted to go…and i wasn’t sure what was gonna happen…i though sod it we’ll go…even if i have to be there on me own with the boys. I was 7 months pregnant at the time…and Dan was in a wheelchair…so it wasnt gonna be easy.
La base di questa card è un cardstock Kraft che ho stampato con il Versamark e un timbro Background della Whiff of Joy..... l'effetto è molto naturale e delicato!! Ho poi giocato con gli strass posizionandoli qua e la.
Let’s just cut to the chase now, shall we? The post has now been up a total of 11 days and has garnered 8247 hits. In fact, the only other thing that comes close to it is the total lifetime hits of my home page, which has exactly 49 more hits. And I’ve had a home page a helluva lot longer than the Whitney post. My total lifetime hits is well on its way to 25K. And still, I’m left shaking my head.
3. I'm going to get more involved with the Pennsylvania Brewer's Guild -- again, if they'll have me -- and learn more about legislation, lobbying, and political action.
when i heard this phrase, it honestly gave me hope in my relationship.
The price of anything is the amount of life you exchange for it – Henry David Thoreau.
Those few of you who have read me long enough, know that I have this debate with myself regularly. I have yet to decide if I’m giving up Twitter (or even, to an extent, blogging) but I sometimes feel that effort is just not worth it.
As Roy approached, Sam slowly huddled closer to Hannah, both hands wrapped around his head. “Hannah,” he whispered, “are you hurt?”
nation.
If you want a really cool Harry Potter experience, read the books. Or listen to the music. Or watch one of the really good movies, such as Deathly Hallows Part 1. Pottermore is decent, but I think there is a lot of room for improvement. I don’t recommend Pottermore for anyone who hasn’t read the books, because there are plenty of spoilers, and more importantly, you’d be confused very quickly. Pottermore explains things fairly well, but some things just make more sense in the books. Overall, Pottermore is interesting. Because not all the books are out yet, I will probably review 2 through 7 together (instead of each year separately) when they’ve all been released. I will continue to explore Pottermore!
* Publication of professors work on the open web (the business model of academic publications is one of the worst. Professors create the content and then the school gets sold back the content. How backwards?)
He fell exalting brotherhood and right,
What you are really saying is that you think we live a life deprived of culinary goodness, and that you are really super closed minded.
Something tells met that woman is still laughing over the transparent humiliation written across my face when I looked at her and said "Oops."
Their love is tested by fire
So I felt very lonely.The world of SFX, and the military, whilst very interesting, didn't really have a lot of "me" there..So I started reaching out to others through the Internet.
But I would stress that to have the military police question hundreds of soldiers after an operation like this, while I understand the political effect, is not good for the army. It won’t save lives. You have to rely on the probes that the army itself carries out.
I wasn't sure about the pasta to tomato sauce ratio, so I removed HALF of the tomato sauce. A "spider" is one of my "must have" kitchen tools. I carefully lifted the pasta with the spider from the water, and into the tomato sauce. I decided to add the rest of the tomato sauce-- feel confident the ratios would be perfect.
Well, I have heard that Blogger isn't
Ranger: Broken China, Tea Dye, Vintage Photo, Walnut Stain distress inks; Antique Bronze distress stickles, Latte, Ginger, Copper Mixative alcohol inks
Why are carbs bad? One side of the argument
There was nothing whimsical about this apple crumble. It was worth sticking two fingers down my throat. Just kidding! Well, I could be making a biased statement here because I am simply not a fan of thick, buttery and calorie-packed crusts. I would choose a Ritz Apple Strudel anytime over this.
Finally, a thanks to those who commented on my mention that I had a no good, very bad day last Saturday. Some of you may recall that I there was a situation with a friend with whom I was very close, who was having lots of issues during a play we were working on last fall and subsequently left the production. He's said lots of awful things about me, and I've just been trying to be dignified and keep my head up because confronting him would have been pointless. He has some significant problems and somehow I've become the scapegoat for them.
I am in the final stages of writing a family memoir, The Memory Of All That. In my father's OSS personnel files, of all places, I have discovered information about his parents' origins that I never knew before. My grandfather Samuel Kaufman, a grocer, hailed from Rowno, Poland. My grandmother, Pauline Gottesfeld Kaufman, hailed from Skala in the Austro-Hungarian Empire, a town which has had a 20th century odyssey of its own without ever moving, as it was then (1887) in the Austro-Hungarian Empire, but over the century was part of Poland, then part of the USSR, until 1990, when Ukraine was made independent, and so today it is in Ukraine.
A gilded shell
Here's some inspiration from our amazing design team to set you on your way. Some of the designers have used some Sassy Studio Design images - so look out for:
22. Rocking Time/Pepper Rock (LP only)
"ITS THE ASS360.....NOT THE ARSE 360 YA TINY LEGGED SHITE!"
By planning your meals each week, before you go to the store, you will save a lot of money (even without using coupons!) It is a pretty easy concept, basically you will plan what your family will eat every day and write it down!
and condolences mysterious
That’s probably been driven in large part because of NaNoWriMo this time. I skipped last year and I’m pretty sure I missed the year before too. That break has let me realize that there’s a lot of stories I’ve had sitting in storage waiting to be told. Not to mention, with my ability to sit down and write, a lot of stories that I could have told and now won’t be able to since they’re passed beyond my mind’s reach. Digging out an old outline from storage and culling it has shown me how much I’ve changed from the person who originally discovered NaNoWriMo. I know that guy wouldn’t have bothered rooting through storage but would have blazed ahead and pulled something out of his head as he went along. But then again, he was also someone who didn’t care too much for the details and once the story was “done”, would have tossed it into storage to be dealt with “later.”
I still think all the women who say they love being pregnant should be arrested for crack usage, but I guess I can somewhat understand the sentiment behind their words.
Then into the kitchen to eat up some food,
The article did seem to focus on women and ‘cravings’ and perhaps it is because we make our desires more obvious than men?? To be honest, I have yet to hear a man say he craves anything….well, yeah perhaps except the obvious!?…so maybe it is a woman thing?? (I can say that right…being of that ‘kind’ myself!).
Hey Ever-buddi.
We have many examples in Scripture for offering of thanks, beginning with our Lord Jesus who gave thanks to the Father every time He broke bread with the disciples and the throngs of people whom He taught (Matt. 14:19 for example). The Apostle John reports that (when demonstrating for the crowd at the tomb of Lazarus that God heard His prayers):
Given the choice between tro-tro collision and cement wipeout, I’d choose the tro-tro every time. First, because I have a thing for tro-tro mates. I’ll put up with quite a lot from tro-tros just for the sake of those guys. Second, because the tro-tro sort of just rolled into me, while the cement slab bruised my buh-tocks, made my leg bleed, sprained my right wrist, and scraped up my left hand.
TABLE 2
Yes, the Police horse loved Pup.
I could go on; I’ve mentioned less than half of the characters and only one of two major plot lines, but I don’t want to spoil the story, which I found to be truly exciting and well told.
“Don’t talk to _________.”
God was there. I felt his presence. I felt my anxiety slipping away. I felt my tiredness melt away. It was a strange experience, but it was good. Very good.
Lewis achieves that by taking the reader on a journey of discovery. It’s usually led by a protagonist who is seeking to understand something complicated. In Moneyball, it’s the manager of the Oakland Athletics, Billy Beane, who learns to use sophisticated statistics developed by baseball enthusiasts such as Bill James to compete with the riches of the New York Yankees.
Hahaa gayness rules
Now, with all the storage in place, it was time to get some labels going. Again, when it comes to kid's spaces, labels are like little magic wands. It's like playing a matching game. Take a toy, match it to the label! Fun stuff right?!
5. I'll be "home" in New York at the end of the month. Flight is booked!
Something I haven’t quite been able to figure out, however, is how much it’ll cost to sift through the legal junk like copyrights and trademarks, as well as what needs to be copyrighted and what needs to be trademarked. Even as a law student, I honestly got completely lost when reading up on it.
I said, “Not that way, he could catch us, see where we are as far as the park goes.”
Foreign and exotic
Work sucks. It’s raining. I’m swamped. But I’m going to pick 5 things this morning – and throughout the day – that I’m grateful for.
11. Kryptonie Live- 3Doors Down
38: Record Number Of Straight Months With Unemployment Rate Above 8 Percent. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, Accessed 4/10/12)
No, it’s not as if we’re carrying on conversations, but there is definitely meaningful communication going on, and there is definite forward progress, and that’s enough for me.
1. returning borrowed items i.e. books, clothing, dvd's. (note to friends~don't lend me anything and if you have, I'm so sorry)
Recently, I was contacted by Kids Formal, an online store that offers the perfect selection of Flower Girl dresses, Special Occasion dresses, Pageant attire, Christening Gowns, First Communion, Boys Suits, Tuxedos, Shoes and Accessories. I love to shop online, but had never heard of this site. I was so glad they reached out because their merchandise is great! This site is now one of my favorites.
NJIT, New Jersey’s science and technology university, enrolls more than 9,558 students pursuing bachelor’s, master’s and doctoral degrees in 120 programs. The university consists of six colleges: Newark College of Engineering, College of Architecture and Design, College of Science and Liberal Arts, School of Management, College of Computing Sciences and Albert Dorman Honors College. U.S. News & World Report’s 2011 Annual Guide to America’s Best Colleges ranked NJIT in the top tier of national research universities. NJIT is internationally recognized for being at the edge in knowledge in architecture, applied mathematics, wireless communications and networking, solar physics, advanced engineered particulate materials, nanotechnology, neural engineering and e-learning. Many courses and certificate programs, as well as graduate degrees, are available online through the Division of Continuing Professional Education.
guests in our home and we love visiting those we are close to. We
I was ready to give up on the Sookie series after the last two books but seeing as the series is coming to an end with next year's book I will finish it up. Plus I've been seeing great reviews on it so I'm crossing my fingers that it's an enjoyable read. If not I didn't spend any $ on it since I picked it up from the library.
That was all the sightseeing we got to do. We had to take the boys to the doctors one day for their checkup and we went to the US Embassy another day to pick up their paperwork in order to go home. But 3 days goes by pretty quickly and soon it was time to leave. We loved Kazakhstan and look forward to taking the boys back when they are older and seeing more of the cities.
As you can see, there has been a marked improvement. My HDL is the only one that is not where it should be yet. With increasing exercise I hope to see that one closer to where it should be (40) by the next visit. I have been trying to walk and exercise daily. Keeping a food journal to track counts and menu planning have been a big part of my success. I shoot for 1400 Calories daily, 175g Carbs and 35g Sugar. Trying to keep sodium under 1800mg. For the fats, 47g total fat with 10.9g or less of that being saturated. Cholesterol target is 300mg or less.
I don't know who Stacey Soloman is but I've been defending her since Saturday night when some Paparazi photographer happened upon her smoking and saw an opportunity to make a few big bucks at her expense.
(gay men and straight women - make your choice from section A)
The Holy Grail of Minecraft. The thing that we all live for. Diamond. The most powerful ore in the game. And since it is the most powerful, of course it is going to be the rarest.
My homework for this week is to develop a syllabus that will guide me and that will have all the fun things in it I enjoy doing; research, self-evaluations, reading, projects, field trips, WRITING and, oh, I don’t know, other fun stuff.
Fifteen minutes in a 350F oven, and I got a nice, semiliquid yolk! This was wonderful, and so nutritious. A happy ending.
Whether by chance or design, the Acer Iconia Tab A200 is an easy tablet to rate. It’s a budget tablet and, as such, there are omissions. But, if you look around at other budget tablets – such as the ZTE Light Tab 2, Disgo 9104 or Archos 70 Internet Tablet – this is better by quite a long shot.
Sunday, with heavy hearts, we packed our bags and enjoyed a last brunch, complete with French Toast! We capped off the weekend with a long walk in the woods. It was an anti-Parisian trip, we felt miles away from our daily lives and jobs. I loved every minute of it.
Hopefully they stay in the new codex, and hopefully we’ll get our crystal targeting matrix back…
Most failing places have the same things wrong:
Transit planners wanted to get people out of their cars on Route 17, the New Jersey Turnpike and the Lincoln Tunnel, so they built a park-and-ride (PDF). Now people can take the train from Ramsey to Hoboken or change for trains to Manhattan. But they're still getting in their cars to go to Ramsey, sometimes for many miles. Why don't the planners see it as part of their mission to get them out of their cars door-to-door?
Do a broad tracking in categories (grocery, transport, cloths, etc.) all the time and also a detailed tracking (types of food etc.) for a limited time span to find out where your money goes.
With the Nets encroachment on New York territory, it does not perturb me like it once would have. With a terrible team, Deon Williams most likely leaving and the diminishing possibility of signing Dwight Howard, the Nets do not threaten me at all. Like the Mets to the Yankees or the Jets to the Giants, they will play the little brother in a city where big brother rules as king. Of course, if the Nets somehow convinced Howard to come play in the BK, my feelings of insecurity would return quicker than Derrick Rose runs the break (pre injury).
This image was obtained from the New York State Museums Website. It is 27 1/4” Hoist X 27 3/4”. The funds for conservation of these flags have been cut due to N.Y. State's financial crisis. It was fortunate that this flag (A Flank Marker; intended to allow the regiment to visually see where the right or left of the unit was located.) was small and easy to conserve.
I asked for help with cooking the chard and was told to treat it just like spinach. In fact, it is a cousin of spinach and it's loaded with antioxidants, vitamins and minerals and also helps to regulate blood sugar. It's one of the most healthful vegetables you can eat and tastes a lot like spinach.
We've been having so much fun livin on Grandma and Grandpas farm this summer!!
to help each and every one of them grow.
The main frustration has been over the British Prime Minister’s pat on the back for Najib in response to the PR stunt over repealing the ISA.
The EU has proudly announced that it has moved to further punish Ukraine for the trial and sentencing of Yulia , by not signing a free trade agreement and putting a freeze on any talks of further integration.
Katie had to borrow money from the teacher and write her a check to reimburse the amount
Total weight gain: None.
“I love Valentine’s Day.” She laughed, wasn’t sure if I was joking, perhaps hoping I was. But the secret was out, so I continued. “I love red, pink and white. I love hearts. I love heart-shaped everything. The candy is the best. Seeing an aisle of red in grocery stores makes me happy.”
Valid points and well made. It's frightening, for sure. I work in higher education and we are feeling times get harder (and jobs less certain) all the time. Burying our heads in the sand isn't going to make it go away.
But then, that would throw the 260-day calendar out of synch with the long count… I’m unsettled.
In the optometrist office, the lady told me I should bring him in after school to get them readjusted because they were pretty warped... no surprise there. I made a mental note, and when they all got home I just decided to wait til a different day since the sun was out for the first time all week, and the kids wanted to plaaaay.
I picked them up at Walmart for 8 dollars (pack of three).
I had heard about this book a lot before I picked it up for reading. It is one of those books which give you a nice story as well as a view of society and its traditions in detail. “Memoirs of a Geisha” is first person narrative of Geisha Sayuri before and after world war II. Geisha means traditional female Japanese entertainer whose skill includes dancing, music along with physical favors to their guests. Arthur Golden has tried to bring in as many details as possible in this narrative making it a live account of Japanese society and the life of Geisha during that time.
Knead about 10-15 times and add a little flour to counter if necessary to keep dough from sticking. Divide the dough into four pieces. On a wax sheet roll out dough and make a square. Use a fork to prick the dough. Then peel off dough carefully and place on baking sheet. Bake bread at 400 degrees for 8-10.
Over the past 2 years, how much time has plaintiff devoted to financial management and how much time was devoted to other endeavors?
Readers, over the weekend, I found one of the very best of these on eBay and I had to buy it. Please meet McCalls 4638 from 1958, a pattern so rare it isn't even listed on the vintage pattern Wiki page! (Am I allowed to add it -- how does that work?)
2009 saw another significant piece of legislation passed dealing with illegal immigration. HB 390 ensures Missouri’s public institutions of higher education do not award financial aid to individuals who are here illegally. The law also requires all post-secondary institutions of higher education to annually certify to the Missouri Department of Higher Education that they have not knowingly awarded financial aid to students who are unlawfully present in the United States.
The pair developed the recipe two years ago after experimenting in Bessant’s kitchen with a borrowed ice cream maker. The idea occurred to the sports buff, from Leigh in Essex, because he regularly advises clients with food allergies and intolerances.
My first photo for my i live here: SF project has gone somewhat viral on flickr. I've never had 200+ views of any photo... and already have several photoshoots lined up. Next Free Friday is already booked.
Cut chicken and vegetables into strips. If you are cooking them on the grill, place all ingredients into a grill basket or pan. Spray with cooking spray and place over direct heat and let them sizzle until they are done. I lined my grill basket with aluminum foil to prevent the juices from escaping. When all is cooked to your liking, remove from heat, let stand for 10 minutes and serve in warm flour tortillas with cheddar or Monterrey jack cheese, sour cream and pico de gallo or salsa. Yum!
Why is it that ‘bedtime’ is such a taboo word, yet as soon as you are in your pjs and curled up in bed, you are a sweet sleepy cherub..
You can win an EveryBody Soap and EveryBody Lotion here on A Year of Jubilee Reviews!!
Yeah, yeah, yeah. They told me stuff, and I knew they were right.
Sorry about the delay to the weekly service: Christmas is a bad season for finding the time to ponder stuff. So this week (well, for the past three weeks), I have mainly been pondering Christmas.
Kelly says: “For me, community sport means doing two things: (1) Providing participative sports opportunities for all members of the community regardless of their age, gender, ethnicity, ability or social status; and (2) Broadening the scope of that sporting activity to include educative/sport initiatives, social inclusion/cohesion projects and other community related activities.
Cesare is also very proud of his Sciacchetrá (Shack-et-Tra), the traditional sweet wine of the Cinque Terre.
She had looked so sad there, I knew the one thing that would cheer her up; lentejas at 1810 and some Quilmes, just what doctor Bob ordered.
sooner or later,
Previously on Mildred Pierce: Mildred kicked her husband to the curb, got a job as a waitress to pay the bills, and was forced to open a restaurant to win the approval of her dreadful daughter, Veda. She also met and started sleeping with Monty Beragon, and then her younger daughter died.
I thought about the Good Friday procession, in which a statue of Jesus’s body was placed in a glass casket and carried through the streets for four hours. I recalled waking up at 3:45 in the morning to hike up a mountain and pick flowers for the church.
I came across an online petition which has been started to 'Stop the development of Eltham Conservative & Unionist Club'. What's this I thought - there is no description of the development nor of the objection by its signatories (currently numbering a lonely 5) - is this the same large Conservative Club with its front entrance onto the Eltham High Street, next to Whitewoods the removal people?
Really quaint little village - a touch English-ey and more of what what you expect Tasmania to be like..
Chris Pye was a useful outlet on the right, as was Sam Hewitt on the left. Sam Schwodler was adamant that he had been tripped in the box, as were BTC moments later, when the referee seemed to make that silent pact that referees are inclined to, in that two mistakes that neither side benefit from are in fact better than one.
CONCERTS FOR KIDS @PUTNAM TRIANGLE PLAZA 10-11am
Written Cece Borjeson
The number one tip I have for building an audience is be authentic. Write in your own voice. As you are reading this, you are hearing me. You know, that American chick living in the UK. That mom who loves her kids, but also pulls her hair out when things start going off the rails. You know, that woman who loves her husband, but takes the mickey out of him at least once a day to keep him from getting too high in the instep. You are reading me and really all your readers want to read is you. An authentic you.
—John Slatin
He gawked at Lady Liberty like a tourist, and she gazed back down with infinite benevolence, like an inconceivably wise and ancient god. The poem inscribed upon the base of the statue brought hope and solace to the destitute and desperate. It was not hard for him to believe that, at one time, people had risked everything to come into her embrace. The statue must have seen hordes of them, fleeing persecution, full of hopes of new opportunities, a new life, and streets paved with gold. Some distant ancestor of his had made the very same journey.
I cut a paper towl tube in threes and then making slits on each side of the tube, we slid a popsicle stick through so the birds would have something to rest on. We spread peanut butter on the tube and rolled it in birdseed finally adding holes and string at the top. The boys picked out spots on the trees in our yard (which will produce pine cones eventually, by the way)to hang their birdfeeders. Mason and I hung ours on the big pine- big referring to all 5 1/2 feet of it. Johnson chose to place his on our 1 1/2 ft. blue spruce for, and I quote, "The little birds". Cute.
“Numerous Department of Energy landfills pose significant remediation challenges. Some existing landfills have contaminants that are migrating, therefore requiring interim containment prior to final remediation. Materials buried in ‘retrievable storage’ pose another problem — the need for retrieval systems that reduce worker exposure and the quantity of secondary waste. In addition development of in situ methods for both containment and treatment is a high-priority need.” (pg. 7).
In the 45 minutes the musician played, only 6 people stopped and stayed for a while. About 20 gave him money but continued to walk their normal pace. He collected $32. When he finished playing and silence took over, no one noticed it. No one applauded, nor was there any recognition.
The red Fuchsia magellanica by the waterfall has been spreading and so huge and wide I actually had to cut it back quite a bit. I had no idea they spread like that, but it must love where it is. Agastache, Daylilies, Hostas, Oakleaf hydrangea, Hollyhocks, Coneflowers and Clematis are all blooming behind the pond.
WEDNESDAY OCTOBER 20, 2010
Is not Borgia Ginz (played sublimely by Jack Birkett), who sneers that people forgot to lead their lives as they 'watched my endless movie', our very own Simon Cowell-Rupert Murdoch cross-breed media magnate pop mogul?
The other four panelists were writer-teachers in the Centre for New Writing, and next came poet Vona Groarke taking a poetry prize perspective. Having been a winner, loser (she said) and judge of poetry prizes, she gave us a blackly funny list of tips for winning which included 'Suffer bereavement or die,' 'If you're not suffering enough be young and beautiful,' and be politically aware but not so much as to frighten the horses. Next she gave us a breakdown of the typical judging panel which included: the villain, ie the panel member who hasn't read the books, usually a celeb; the hung jury which is so split that it's fundamentally incapable of functioning or results in a mediocre acceptable winner; the over-enthusiastic panel member who is incapable of making a detached decision; and the king maker who prizes youth and promise over achievement. This last she saw as a big problem: too many judges want to be in at the beginning of writers' careers; they want to feel that they have found someone. Mostly she felt that decisions end in compromise, and that in order to win, a collection has to be either outstandingly irreproachably wonderful or outstandingly irreproachably mediocre. On the whole, she thought it was astounding that prize juries ever get it right, and acknowledged that sometimes they do.
Along the way, I was able to help someone net a nice steelhead. Roger had on a beauty and after about 10 minutes he was able to wear it out and get it near shore. Steelhead were hitting and jumping everywhere. Pretty exciting. It almost made me wish I had a 9wt.
And in the writings he left us, he has kindly given us means to look over his shoulder, and to be gripped by the very steadfast love and faithfulness that gripped him.
I have been reading a lot of posts from others about the disfellowshipping issue, and learning some surprising things in the process. I will be citing and posting them.
I hope you all had fabulous New Year. I'm still writing 2007 on my checks so I guess it hasn't hasn't quite sunk in for me yet!! Here in the San Francisco Bay area we've just gone through some crazy storms and extended power outages. Some folks still have no power so I'm one of the lucky ones!! ; )
to tell us that it's okay to shine,
Gibbous moon energy helps us fine tune our goals, gather opinions from others and make revisions to the plan.
The rule of thumb is: the greater the complexity of the molecules, the lower the g. The lower limit is 1. Argon and helium atoms only translate, that is, they move along straight paths until they encounter another atom. Room air molecules translate and rotate (about 2 of their axes). Hot air starts to vibrate (as two nuclei connected by a spring). Molecules of fuel vapor have a lot of opportunity to vibrate, even at room temperature. The products of combustion vibrate. However, only the translation of the molecules PUSHES the piston. The other modes of molecular motion do nothing for pushing the piston. Thus, as g drops (indicating more vibration of the molecules), h drops. A lean engine (ie, an engine with excess air) has a cooler combustion process and more air relative to fuel than the typical engine with a chemically correct mixture. Thus, its g is higher, and its h is greater.
At the beginning of this week, I felt nervous. I had a bit of a hard time sleeping and couldn't get the anxious thoughts out of my mind . . . Am I crazy for taking Japanese II and Chemistry II in the same semester? Why did I sign up for Intro to Psychology, I'm not even remotely interested in that stuff . . . What will come of the new semester of school???
Holly Bohn is the Founder and Creative Director. The idea for See Jane Work came when one of her many trips to an Office Superstore left her feeling frustrated and unsatisfied. "There is only so much you can do with smoke-colored plastic trays," she exclaimed "There must be another way!" After consulting with several friends, she realized there were stylish office supplies out there; they were just so hard to find. See Jane Work was born, the online destination for office style and organization.
In short, political pundits are always brilliant in hindsight.
The Vittorio is coming along nicely I am 100 & some odd rows in I am close to be half way done with the shawl. I also finished my dishcloth for April.I will post a picture next time I still need to take one for my Raverly Page.
15 Broadcast - Unchanging Window
Earlier this week I read one of those blogs (not unlike my own) that was all about simple things we can all do to help improve the environment. This particular writer proposed something very simple that I’d never heard before. ”Save approximately 5 gallons of water a day by cutting 2 minutes from your shower time.” (Forgive me, but I can’t remember where I read this.)
"The opposition are never going to win any elections in Venezuela, ever again,"
Helen and Joel asked me to sing during the wedding breakfast which was held in the sumptuous drawing room. Their photographer was the excellent Lars Lange who took this splendid picture of me in action:
Finally they were tested for overall life satisfaction.
So while maybe we all don't have the budget of a princess, here are some tips that I think we can all take from this iconic style icon.
They're French. You do realize what they're going to say to me if I lay this pearl of wisdom on them?
I met a real-life woman and I'm crazy-dogshit-in-love with her.
I decided... I am not good enough to do those fancy styles. And she is not a movie star. She is a beautiful little girl. And her hairstyle should reflect that. I decided to go simple. So 2 hours of comb and braiding and beading last night and this is how she went to bed last night (and school this morning).
Poor body image is directly related to self-hatred. I hate myself so I also hate my body. Women who have been abused spend lots of time trying to hide their bodies, the idea being, “If I can become ugly or invisible no one will try to take advantage.” This outward need to become hidden is sad but when this is broken it is beautiful to watch.
She thought she was ready to come back, to forget about Holden and to let go of the rage consuming her.
And it was 9:00 PM.
And, how my perception of what was a long walk, or a short walk (or run) didn’t change overnight. Literally, it took several days of repeating that route before it seemed to become quite manageable. (Which suggests to me that one-day events are not enough to alter perceptions – week-long campaigns would be better. !!)
I finished my first set of classic novels. I’ve already written about Cold Comfort Farm, here, and The Woman in White, here. I loved those books. The third, The God of Small Things by Arundhati Roy, I didn’t love. Not even a little. Looking over at the book irritates me. Thinking of if and how to write about it irritates me even more.
“Like these people are so underprivileged and they don’t have much. You know sometimes I wish our friends would get it and like we get it. Discussing pent-house apartments and large salaries and expensive things is so bad. I mean I know we have these things, but we shouldn’t flaunt it right??” Other girl agrees “we should do something to make our friends understand their plight”
Topping/Garnish
Someone would have to “smoke a joint the size of a telephone pole,” to get high from hemp, Roger Johnson, a hemp supporter and president of the National Farmers Union, said in a telephone interview.
But times are changing. We'd done so much traveling in beautiful Little Gracie, that her mileage was getting on up there for a young vehicle. We also needed to see where we could save money. Figuring we could save half (did you read that?) HALF of my gas budget if we downsized, we knew we needed to be good stewards.
Sandra Bullock, The Blind Side
it is what it is - life moves on
cooked sausage (I generally use leftover medium-spicy Italian sausage)
as well as this little fellow. The painted stone I picked up at a craft stall some time ago, I imagine that it is me sitting on the rock looking out to sea!
I will let the pictures speak for themselves!
If I thought I could get away with it, I would wear this dress. It is so bright and happy, and I LOVE those fluoro green shoes, LOL! (Those of you who know me in real life will be aware that I am very conservative with my clothing colours that I actually wear, so this might surprise you).
they are the mayan wind. the force to push against. you have defined
Well I just realised I have not updated my blog for over a month. Probably because something else is distracting me, a little person by the name of Ella.
Antonio Almeida, University of São Paulo, and Juliana de Oliveira Vicentini, University of São Paulo. The Globo Reporter Discourse about the Amazonian Drought
But don’t let anyone convince you that we don’t already stand under the shower of God’s good words and great love pouring over us. Jesus is making sure of that.
The Solar Electric Light Fund (SELF), a Washington, D.C. based non-profit, develops solar energy solutions that bring modern connectivity to the most remote parts of the world — in an environmentally sound way.
2a. I read and re-read that line when we were living out of a suitcase in Jaipur and announced to P. that I was getting rid of all non-essential, surface-cluttering, unused and unproductive stuff when we moved back to the States. Now, almost six months later in Brooklyn, I can happily say we purged about a third of all our belongings. I gave away all the clothes I haven't worn in two years. We sold or donated a lot of our Joshua Tree furniture to people who could really use, say, a pair of killer mid-century patio chairs in sea-foam green. We sold our old Jeep. We *might* even sell the Scamp (insert long complicated sigh here). We still have more books than we can shake a stick at and I couldn't stand to part with my illustrious collection of found raptor feathers, but we're making progress on the stuff front. Slow but real progress. And it feels pretty cathartic to start a new chapter of our lives with less *stuff.* Happy fall, urbody.
A year is 365.25 days. Every four years, we get an extra day. February 29 is that day, it fell on a Wednesday this year.
Coach Lynn: Calm and assertive, Coach Lynn supported his head coach and the team, running warm-ups and stepping up to take over seamlessly when Coach Miguel had to drive the many miles between venues to coach his older girl’s team.
Even if I feel like crying on the inside...I just fake it til I make it. Usually I can talk myself out of a frowny mood. I just smiled at you...Pass It On!!!
Cuba has not published comprehensive data about its foreign debt since 2007.
In time, Farmer Fleming’s son graduated from St. Mary’s Hospital Medical School in London, and went on to become known throughout the world as the noted Sir Alexander Fleming, the discoverer of Penicillin.
But I gave her a bath that very next morning. And apparently - she’s decided “ it’s all good. “ with an attitude and assumption that it's no big deal. She may have to face that fly swatter. But at the end of the day - Mom will just give her a bath and let her back inside the house.
Here is a closer look at my image:
This space has certainly evolved. For about the last four years, I have been in a perpetual migration, searching for studio space to experiment in watercolors. I have enjoyed the extra bedroom in my house that formerly served as a study for my high school and college preparations. I have also been grateful to the Burson Gallery in Hillsboro for providing studio space during summer months over the years. I have as well enjoyed the back of my open Jeep Grand Cherokee, the idyllic pasture lands of Lyndon Acres in Burleson, and anyplace else I could park to work in watercolor, whether en plein air or in an enclosed room.
b. March 12, 1826; d. November 25, 1899
(just FYI, that ‘Sherlock’ mini-series on the Beeb was pretty good, although 90 minutes per ep was pushing it a bit.)
Attempting to flirt with boys. There are so many more of them here.
We closely work together with our graphic design partner for the typesetting. Although there is a standard typesetting, we modify the typesetting for the different markets across Europe, and sometimes even for a particular book, to achieve the best readability possible.
somedays everything just seems to go wrong, no? today was such a day, and considering it's the first day of november and the first day of (yet another) new work schedule/plan for us at lua nova, i feel so discouraged, realizing that things will probably just continue to go on in the haphazard and disorganized fashion of the last two months. (nooooooo!!!)
I am not going to start by praising or deriding it, but rather take a detour and talk about Erich Maria Remarque, before plunging into the work. (Have patience! Mr Remarque was a remarkable man of his time and its worth reading about such real life heroes as well.) We might have heard of Mr Remarque’s other more “popular’ book called “All quiet on the Western front”…..right it was also made into an Oscar winning film; but it was a book for a long while before it became a Hollywood magnum project. Anyhow, my trusted source (you got it: Wikipedia) informs me that Mr Remarque was born in Germany in 1898 and began writing from the age of 15. He was drafted into the German Army and served in the Western Front (Yup! You can finally make the “connection”….All Quiet on the Western Front was novel derived from his war experience!). Post the war, he dabbled in various occupations including teaching, journalist, librarian and a businessman. He published some minor works; fame finally came with his magnum opus “All Quiet on the Western Front” in 1927. He would then go on to publish various other works, The Road Back, Arch of Triumph, Flotsam etc. and of course Three Comrades. Before divulging into the book, I just want to share one small nugget about his life which makes him a hero – he wrote in dangerous times – Nazis were gaining power in Germany. Mr Remarque, a true humanitarian was horrified at what Germany was becoming and went on a self-imposed exile to Switzerland and became a naturalized US citizen in 1947. While in exile in Switzerland, he was in turns coaxed and coerced into returning to Germany. When all means failed, his sister and her family were arrested and executed for ‘undermining morale” of the State and his book were banned. He never went back to Germany. He died in 1970.
I could get in my back yard.
I have also been thinking about the important psychological shift that this implies. If we are in a crisis that the economists, big businesses, investors, bankers, politicians and government are going to resolve and bring us out of, then we are waiting for others to resolve our personal woes. We make others responsible for us finding a job; for us being able to obtain or maintain a home, whether renting or buying one; for us to lack the fear to start or invest in something new. However if we stop using the word crisis and accept that this is the new reality and realize that these are the new times and circumstances that are ours to live, then all of a sudden the responsibility to move forward in life is our own.
I used 2 coats and 1 layer of Seche Vite for the photos.
These shoes are now featuring far too often in my posts but how can I help this? They are perfect! If you want a pair of shoes that will give you legs for days these are the ones for you. I'm not super tall but these shoes make me feel like an amazon. In the next month I shall be
So here I am, hacking away, trying to stay awake, and taking all this medicine to avoid another acute attack. The NP told me: “Whether I treat you or not, you are at very high risk for having this happen again.”
A friend stopped over to buy some of my leftover hay and I did a little mowing.
I can easily see the progression of these changes back to the beginning of my blog.
Think I might have a soak in the bath first in the hope of "livening my ideas up"!! LOL!!! That is something Mum said to us as kids if we weren't moving quickly enough. She would say "for goodness sake liven your ideas up". Tee hee!!
Fast forward to 2012 and part of that wish has come true as, in conjunction with the Edinburgh Science Festival, the National Library of Scotland will be presenting a free exhibition under the amusing title of It’s Life Jimmy, But Not As We Know It covering science fiction written in Scotland.
By Yusuf ibn Abdullah al-Arafi
In the following video, Patricia King discusses Isaiah 40:31. As she’s explaining what this verse means, she shares a tale about an angel named ”Swift” who visited her years ago. This angel didn’t appear as normal angels would, this angel supposedly presented itself in the form of a brown and gold eagle…
Just one example of the weekend's synchronicity: I was telling my workshop attendees that anything they feel passionate about can be their vehicle for exploring and expressing their spirituality. Mine happens to be the harp. Theirs could be, for instance (and I have no idea why I said this, of all things)...turtles.
Tide, Downy, Bounce or Tide Stain Release $0.50/1
TB: The plans are: to continue to provide touring poets with a viable connection through southwestern Ontario; to provide our audiences with diverse styles and talented artists on a regular basis; to support our team players; to gain recognition as a slam poets’ touring destination; to work with our communities to present a balance of different voices; to share opportunities and continue to work together as members of the provincial and national spoken word communities … oh, and to be awesome. We’re definitely planning on continuing to be awesome.
S/he also has a hotline to the Almighty about whether such unions are "acceptable." Something, I as a professed though uncertain Christian do not share.
The easiest grill to use is by far the natural gas grill. Natural gas grills are designed to hook directly into your home’s natural gas line, eliminating the need to provide the fuel source. Natural gas grills are also one of the easiest grills to clean since you do not have to worry about cleaning out the charcoal or wood.
On my wall upstairs it says "Follow Your Heart" and that is what I am doing. Not just in regards to this new relationship but in other areas too. I know I want to settle down properly, be creative, be who I am, get my masters, have a career but along that journey I also want children.
Normally, the face is in the water during front crawl with eyes looking at the lower part of the wall in front of the pool, with the waterline between the brow line and the hairline. Breaths are taken through the mouth by turning the head to the side of a recovering arm at the beginning of the recovery, and breathing in the triangle between the upper arm, lower arm, and the waterline. The swimmer’s forward movement will cause a bow wave with a trough in the water surface near the ears. After turning the head, a breath can be taken in this trough without the need to move the mouth above the average water surface. A thin film of water running down the head can be blown away just before the intake. The head is rotated back at the end of the recovery and points down and forward again when the recovered hand enters the water. The swimmer breathes out through mouth and nose until the next breath. Breathing out through the nose may help to prevent water from entering the nose. Swimmers with allergies exacerbated by time in the pool should not expect exhaling through the nose to completely prevent intranasal irritation.
Blood and feathers on grass
Frequently asked questions:
I made the mistake the first time, going on a Monday when it was closed, and the whole shopping center looked condemned. It was all cordoned off and you had to drive around the service entrances in the back to even get to it. This photo was taken on the second try a few weeks later, and it was MUCH better. I really felt sorry for the businesses electing to stay as the mess had to discourage business unless you were a previous customer who KNEW it was still open.
he 30-year-old American had her serve broken in the third game of the opening set but immediately gained the break back.
As it must have been like mine
And ‘the white feet of sound’- Sri Aurobindo’s Savitri
So the ending. There’s still some trouble with the ideas in the ending. Why does Captain It murder Tania? And specifically why did sie murder Nikki in the first place? Did sie do it all by hirself or did Nagual help? Because here we are at the resolution and it seems that Nagual is now only very underdeveloped as a character but he’s had god-like powers of observation all along.
We rang around our immediately family to let them know the good news and in the evening we went out to celebrate at a chinese restaurant that we’ve been going to for years.
On the eve of this millennium, Nelson Mandela and friends lit candles mapping the shape of their continent and declared the Twenty-first Century would belong to Africa. Whatever. Meantime, the vast natural resources have been frittered and agricultural production since independence has halved. A pity that for every one Mandela there are over a hundred Robert Mugabes.
Best of all, it's a super-easy recipe. The only ingredient I had to go out of my way for was sour cream, which is easy enough to arrange. This would be great for a dinner party, a tea, or just to have around the house as a snack.
The second is less of a technique and more of an infrastructure choice. Jetty (version 6) is a relatively well-known Java Servlet container that is mostly used when embedded in one of the larger JEE Application Servers. Standalone, however, it is perfectly capable. It also has a trick up its sleeve when it comes to implementing long polling.
I decided to journal a bit about a process of growth that I'm going through. Refining, growing, changing... it's not easy. Sometimes it's tempting to get frustrated with the journey that you're on. Instead, I'm choosing to embrace the process.
and I'm soaking through and through
It's at that point that I broke down and almost cried. I was wearing a hoodie. I had walked to the convenience store with thoughts of hopes, dreams, and uncertainties wandering through my head. I took time on that walk to laugh and to be sad. I was just a normal person doing normal things. Trayvon Martin and I shared all of those in common. In a show of I don't know what, I bought Skittles and an iced tea. It just seemed right.
All I can hope for now is that she knows how much I loved her and how much I valued our friendship. I hope she knows that she was such an important piece of my life and that I truly wouldn't be who I am today, if it hadn't been for her. I have so many regrets, and I hope she knows that my laziness in keeping in touch with her, and my fear of spending too much money, had nothing at all to do with her. I hate that I had to learn my lesson this way, but if I could go back in time, I'd buy those plane tickets without even flinching at the cost. I'd send her more emails and call her more often. I'd make every effort that I possibly could to let her know how much she means to me. Sadly, all I can do now is to simply honor her memory and treasure the memories that I have of her forever. So to anyone who is reading this - please treasure your friends and family. Hug them daily and let them know how much they mean to you. Don't make excuses to put off till tomorrow what you can do today. Life is simply too short and tomorrow may not always be there.
cliveppalmerbratvorst
To my surprise, she replies,"It's a brewpub about eight blocks up the road, you ought to go sometime."
Till then, the rest of us get to comment and critique. I would love to see you there--and I promise that if you have any constructive criticisms I will be delighted. I want this piece to be the strongest it can be.
This month I only did one swap and won two giveaways and I loving everything!
We had lots of ideas, but only one short day to shoot as much as we could.
They mocked him for the little autistic noises he made: “Who are you talking to, nobody?” And when he wanted reassurance that he would see his dad again after a weekend with his non-custodial mom, his teacher cruelly said "No!" When he started to whimper, she followed with, "Shut your mouth!"
UERIGE - Sticke, Doppelbock
With all this, there is the added worry that realistically, any older child that we choose to adopt could have this disorder or some variation of it. Are we equipped to handle the emotional aspect of this? In all honesty, I think God has brought these things to light now as part of our journey. By looking into my own baggage and learning how to lean on others and ask for help, I will grow more dependent on God and on my family to help me. By helping my friend through this diagnosis and trying to help her child, we all will have an idea of what we could be in for. I truly believe that everything happens for a reason and God gives us exactly what we need when we need it, even if we don’t agree. So, thank you God for exposing my flaws and weaknesses and helping me to improve them and challenging me to do something about them now! Thank You for giving me a husband with his own flaws and weaknesses so that we can work on those together as well. Life with You is never boring and we have to trust the You know what You are doing!
The first is that Moffat drags up the whole Russell T Davies bit about the Doctor being super dangerous and being a weapon. Moffat’s been using his own version of this since SILENCE/FOREST when he tells the Vashta Nerada to “look me up” in all of the books in the library. I like that we’ve got this enemy of the Doctor building an army to stop him and I like that we know so little about them but when you start playing the Doctor As Weapon and Doctor’s Friends Are Dying Because Of This Cards, then you get dangerously close to Davies’ maudlin melodrama. (Murray Gold even brings back some of Ten’s music to get this point across, I believe.)
7) We like a good visual.
Satan loves to tell us that we have messed up and things will never be the same again, and that we should give up. He wants us to be so consumed with guilt, pain and bitterness so that we feel hopeless. But God says otherwise. It does not matter what you have done, no matter what has happened in your past, you still have a future. God can and will restore your life and put the pieces back in one piece, but you must allow Him to do so, without trying to be God.
In the 1930s, naturopathy dramatically declined for several reasons. Allopathic medicine finally stopped using such therapies as bloodletting and heavy metal poisons as curative compounds. New therapies were more effective and less toxic. Allopathic medical schools became increasingly well-funded by foundations with links to the emerging drug industry.
These findings stand in stark contrast to the claims made by the 'Save Our Pubs' campaign - a tobacco industry funded font group...
Thanks for stopping by my post today.
And the promises they hold.
(or you can skip the pocket and just use it as a way to identify your luggage)
Street Fighter X Tekken is Capcom’s latest entry in their long running cross-over fighting series. This time Capcom’s Street Fighters take on Namco Bandai’s Tekken characters in an over-the-top 2 vs 2 tag fighter. Aimed as a fighting game for both Street Fighter and Tekken fans-alike, does Street Fighter X Tekken “cross the line” between these two franchises or does it miss its mark?
If you have an energy field and there’s the possibility of having some kind of a discharge from that field. The problem is the behavior of the lights and the form of the lights seen by literally thousands of people around the world in these various locations doesn’t fit neatly into any theory of electrodynamics.
while water cries and wind speaks
traxfromwax:
Robyn's Fetish Digital Stamps And More, a division of I Did It Creations, was created and is
Not least of all, it was exciting to see Marwan Bishara tweet my review of his book. I took that as a nod of approval.
This film is accurate, emotional, and… necessary. I hope more organizations in more cities will show A Girl Like Her. People outside of the adoption triad really need to see this film.
Setbacks
It's been a weird time since then. He's changed an awful lot. Some funny things have happened. He's switched from just loving women to saying similar stuff about men. At first I thought he was taking the piss.
(Don't miss to visit them on your next concert-trip over to Köln!)
Below, we document the five of the worst anti-environmental initiatives being pushed by ALEC.
I will tell you right now that if you don’t have this information, looking at your royalty statement is meaningless.
Charlson Ong’s story progresses through a series of character portraits where the investigation is related through the eyes of the various individuals involved. For instance the manageress of the Blue Angel is the whiskey drinking Rosa Misa. She’s a former singer, who saw her dreams crushed and with the help of Antonio Cobianco opens the bar where patrons can come, relax and listen to live music. When the investigation begins she is initially resistive and insists that nothing untoward have ever take place in her bar.
I filled these little beauties with my homemade strawberry and rhubarb jam. Oh my goodness – I can’t even put into words how yummy these were. Also, so simple. I whipped them up probably in 30 minutes total.
In 5D to come in as a state of being you have to master first loving yourselves. A Feeling that is not a construct of emotions or from a sexual nature. The connection in finding self-love will set you free. In you remembering the love for the self you open up the possibilities needed to build the link to the unconditional love for all of that is. You will not be that easy tripped in or pulled out the love for all outside of you anymore by learning self-love.
At Happy Bhudda, the Chinese restaurant down the street from my hostel.
Ewww…dog!, thought Malcolm turning up his nose, do they ever bathe?
I found my perfect match in a little folding table we already had from our earlier homeschooling years. My mat and lights fit it perfectly, it's easy to move (I can do it myself without a hammer!), and it's low profile. I can even cover it with a cute table cloth if I so desire (I find an oil cloth makes it easier to wipe down when necessary).
Join Haiti Cultural Exchange for a discussion with Edouard Steinhauer about his
So, the challenge of taking these two somewhat opposing styles of writing and blending them together was what really inspired me. When I combined a main character I felt I knew well with the goal of writing a novel that combined these disparate genres, and then added all that to the beginnings of a plot I had stewing wherein a computer hacker, himself, gets hacked, I knew I had all the pieces I needed.
Of course if you are going to walk down the street looking like Jessica Rabbit, men are going to look until their eyes pop out, so will I to be honest. Some men just stare and pay a compliment. In most cases compliments increase our confidence and add an extra spring in our step and in my opinion this kind of complimentary attention is welcome.
I like blogs. I like the huge variety of blogs out there, but I'm sad to see so many blogs are closed up, their lights out and nobody home.
Pyszczynski did respond promptly to the criticism of his research that I posted yesterday. After the burst of personal abuse that one expects from Leftists he did have two actual points to make:
In other news, I moved the pillows from the kitchen banquette to the living room and love the way they pop against the inky blue pillows ( from Radiance From Ruins). Why did I not do this sooner? You gotta love a free update.
68. The Prince of Tides (Nick Nolte) - A heart-wrenching story.
I love this. They can learn history, art, and music; they can also learn critical thinking, diversity, application of new skills, and perseverance. But why stop there? They also learn interpersonal and social skills by playing games and working out their differences with other people (including children of different ages and, dare I say, ADULTS), that gives them practice in understanding the viewpoints and needs of other people. They learn the value of connectivity, as they meet and interact with people from all parts of the world -a critical skills in a global economy. And goodness knows they learn the technology, as any three-thumbed, fumbling parent knows; most of our children are far more adept at using technology than we are.
That’s the plan! Before I sign off, though, I MUST remind you all that my official limited edition T-shirts to benefit the Jamie Oliver Food Foundation and their nutrition education programs in schools are only on sale for the next TEN DAYS. Buy a shirt and support better food for kids across the country.
I love undergarments that help to suck it in and make me look smoother and leaner, so when I was sent the ShaToBu Get Fit Tight High Waist Shaping Tight I was excited to give them a try. These tights not only shape your body, but help tone your muscles and burn up to 12% more calories. Now honestly burning 12% more calories isn't going to make a huge difference, and I wouldn't wear these working out, but if they're going to help me burn more calories just by going about my day, why not?
Oh, and in other news, I got my new comp running. It’s brilliant, beautiful, and sexy. I mean, I can run Chrome, which used to take minutes to boot, only to crash at the drop of a hat. It’s also fast enough to
It was wonderful to get to spend so much time with family! Mom and dad Twichel were wonderful and watched Abby for us so Scott and I could get out and not have to worry about Abigail. She tried blueberries for the first time and she loved them. The blue mustache was pretty cute!
Everyone I know is out drinking and having fun; and yet I find that I’m lying in bed, wearing my ‘Miss Stubborn’ tee and reading Charles Bukowski poetry like the pretentious nerd I’m turning into. In a while, I’m going to pop my pills and then attempt to sleep.
The truth is- I am terrified. I declined all prenatal testing with her- just as I did with her brothers- because I KNOW it doesn't matter. In my heart, I KNOW that no matter what I will love her.
Spending money like there’s no tomorrow
My girls were like seagulls, waiting for that feed to finish and then fighting over who got to sit next to shiny new baby.
April 25, 2009
For the first time ever, I now understand the difficult feeling of not being able to take time off from work.
armed kidnappers including
Pretty Lights, otherwise known at Derek Smith, is a DJ that is known for creating pastiches of music by sampling older works and incorporating them with new sounds. This song, Steve Miller Band Fly Like An Eagle Remix is a pastiche of the song Fly Like an Eagle by the group Steve Miller Band. Fly Like an Eagle came out on Steve Miller Band’s ninth studio album, American Rock in 1976. I would say that this is not a parody of the original Fly Like an Eagle because although it does sample some of the original song it does not “imitated for comic effect or in ridicule“ purposefully. I feel that it is meant to be an extension of the original piece, with a modern twist, but to some listeners I’m sure that they feel that Pretty Lights pastiches’ are an insult to the original piece of music. A large majority of Pretty Lights music is pastiche of older hits like Something’s Got a Hold on Me by Etta James, At Last I Am Free by Robert Wyatt, and even Black Dog by Led Zeppelin (whosampled.com); again none of them are meant to be parody’s of the original tunes, but depending on the listener it could be interpreted that way.
6. Loki’s first act of brutality gave a hint of darkness in the film. But it was very much toned down after that. (Nandukot ng mata? Pambata?)
A: Being an ex-pat has taught me that we live in a big world. What we consider to be "the way it is" sometimes turns out to be just a local attitude. When you get out of your own little neighborhood you meet people who see things from a different vantage point. And that's enlightening. In my writing, it's made me careful to explain American terms and customs for an international audience. I can't expect readers in Amsterdam to know that CHP stands for California Highway Patrol, or that "Red or green?" refers to my heroine's choice of salsa. The big thing I learned is that people in Britain consider California to be exotic. I thought Santa Barbara was an ordinary place to grow up, but my English friends pictured it as Baywatch - all bikinis and jet skis and automatic weapons. And hey, I was more than happy to write stories set in a world I love, and that they find fascinating.
As if he was reading my mind all along,he smiled and spun me out into a flourish-filled ending,much to the delight of everyone in the class.Cheers and laughter continued,but as they faded and the group dispersed for the night,Kavya persisted in holding on to my hand,his fingers laced with mine.The music faded to a dramatic finish,and i finally decided to look at his face.
Director, Central Intelligence Agency (‘06-‘09)
Toss cubed zucchini, squash, and mushrooms in a bowl with olive oil and a sprinkling of kosher salt. Arrange onto two sheet pans (to avoid crowding) and roast in the hot oven for 5 to 10 minutes, or until brown and black parts begin to show. Remove from oven and set aside.
However, before I delete these off my phone, I am making a Spamapalooza-post so that all that time wasted won't feel as wasted.
They both are addicted to books, and we must get 20 books each week at the library, but that lasts about two days.. if I try to make them last....... Right now I am contemplating getting each of them a small suitcase on wheels to take to the library each week. It would help a lot.
his shower puff feet and
Up to 13 million barrels of oil have spilled in the Niger Delta ecosystem over the past 50 years, representing about 50 times the estimated volume spilled in the Exxon Valdez disaster in Alaska in 1989. Niger Delta Natural Resource Damage Assessment and Restoration Project, PDF.
Meanwhile, Israel has been drafting emergency plans to address expected power outages this summer.
In no time at all it was time to get ready for Christmas. I was done with the cleaning out of the second floor and some of the Attic. I wanted to dress the house for the holidays before it got much colder. My brother and his family were coming for Christmas because I was going to their house for Thanksgiving day. This early November Wednesday, I had climbed the ladder to the attic and I was looking for the outdoor decorations. The wooden Santa and Sled for the porch roof had been found in the potters shed out back, and I found someone at work to hire to give them a new coat of paint. But, I was looking for the candy canes and fake candy garland that granddad used to have on the porch rail and steps. And if I didn’t get it set out soon the weather would turn too cold and I only had so many Autumn days left to get the job done in.
The customer retorted, “Oh don’t be silly. Everyone knows where it is. Check your map!”
The bulk of the book is the section "Rejections and Responses." The remainder of the book consists of the text of the patent statutes and a Table of Cases. My personal opinion is that the patent statute section is a waste of paper because if I want the text of a statute I look to the MPEP (online or my two-volume softcover). But going to a second source is an extra step, so maybe some will find it useful to have the statutes in this book.
Oh Holy Hell just run for the hills now….Seriously…grab the women and children and HEAD FOR THE HILLS….
Title: Hellbound: Hellraiser II (1988)
Outdoor shoots have had to be put off and even a simple walk to the shops with my daughter saw us a arrive a little damp.
Commencement will be bittersweet for Nisei alumni like Sameshima, 91, whose educations were interrupted by internment during World War II and who will finally receive degrees from their alma mater. Nine former students will take part, school officials said.
Congratulations Jac if you could please contact Me ( Debbie ) so I can arrange for your prize to be emailed to you, Thanks.
curled up with a good book
The beneficial practice of negative eugenics can be found in preventing individuals who are two closely related (incest) from breeding, which we do with great regularity in all states. Another would be screening prospective parents for potential blood-type reactions (RH factors). Another would be genetically screening individuals who carry or are symptomatic of genetic/inherited deformities, illnesses or abnormalities that threaten the life, health and physical and mental capacity of any prospective children. Why would someone want to pass on a terminal genetic illness to their offspring if it could be avoided? There is a difference between parenting and procreating. Only a real narcissist would insist on passing on his genetic illness or abnormality to his offspring just because…. People who want to parent can always adopt. The last prospective positive use of negative eugenics could be manifest in using gene therapy to prevent such illnesses (when it becomes available).
I was thinking that I wish the church could be…
Women of Uganda have seen the betrayal of the state that is supposed to protect their rights. Two cases have been in the spotlight.
If Rani Lakshmi Bai and Rani Chennamma of Kittur were some of the heroic queens we worshipped as children, it was Kiran Bedi who was the heroine of our teenage years.
to raise
Today Sunday is of course no exception. We spotted in today's thick six-dollar Sunday edition no fewer than 6 - SIX ! - pro-homo propaganda puff pieces. They are listed below here on COTT :
In the meantime, which ones are your faves, and what shall I make next!?
The Mississippi Supreme Court reversed a lower court’s ruling that approved construction of Southern Co’s USD 2.8 billion coal gasification project in Kemper County, Mississippi.
He's ultra sincere, passionate in his beliefs, and amazingly interesting to converse with.
This annual event takes place at the fairmont hotel in kansas city and soil. This was because the fairmont hotel in kansas city for suburbs such as the fairmont hotel in kansas city an excellent place to build settlements and find relocation for the fairmont hotel in kansas city is due to reopen in 2009 after extensive renovations. Moving to Kansas City as the fairmont hotel in kansas city from the fairmont hotel in kansas city was because the fairmont hotel in kansas city for suburbs such as oil production and mining, as well as traditional Polish music and entertainment. This event features barbeque food from restaurants all over Kansas are anxious to display their support for their favorite team play. Members of the fairmont hotel in kansas city a wonderful view of the larger distribution centers for stores like Sears and Kmart. There are a number of call centers, which hire and maintain a large number of new communities that either are currently under construction or have just been completed. These communities may offer a hit in gem of an official territory.
What the Govt through it's smoke free political lobby groups is really asking parents to sign up to today in making smoking history for our children is the criminalisation of those same children as "the next logical step."
Tris unlike the other three members of the Circle doesn’t approach her magic with the same carefree attitude. She views her weather magic for what it really is, a deadly force, something that could turn on her in a moment. Instead of just using her magic willy-nilly like her brother and sisters, she for the most part contemplates the effect that her meddling may have on the world around her. Honestly this is probably the reason I like Shatterglass the best. By the turn of the pages I became more interested in who Tris had become and who she could be. It is Tris who we understand the least, who we don’t know as well, and who grows and changes significantly while the story goes about.
Exactly as before, the match staff were efficient, welcoming, and friendly and remembered us from our last shlep to the range in February.
So, that’s my plan for this spring break, also. I hope you enjoy these sweet and simple moments in God’s Word with me!
Phat Tyre - 10gal
Since the day is almost over, I'll write the procrastination one.
To City Council Member Letitia James, the leading political opponent of Atlantic Yards, the federal lawsuit filed yesterday by seven would-be Atlantic Yards workers, who claim they were promised construction jobs and union cards after finishing a highly competitive training program, confirms that the project “was the greatest bait and switch in the history of Brooklyn.”
Moving on to the real reason for this post…
1) Scrub my cast iron griddle with steel wool and reseason it after my sublettor left it rusty.
Side note: I could rant for days about why I dislike Apothica, but it's basically down to their fucking ludicrous shipping prices versus excessive packaging. Back when Apothica were spamming the blogosphere with gift certificate giveaways left and right, I happened to win one. It was for $25 and I spent it on a tube of Too Faced Shadow Insurance, which I was charged over $20 to ship. Although it came within a few days, it came in a box big enough to ship three fucking university textbooks in. I was livid.
Ma and Pa where rocking on the front porch when Pa turned and slapped Ma, Ma said what was that for? Pa said for forty years of bad sex. Ma said oh and continued rocking. Ma reached over and slapped Pa. Pa said what was that for? Ma said for knowing the difference.
Thank you, Linda, for that insight into your work. I agree that Lob has the potential for a wide audience (I certainly enjoyed it!), and would certainly recommend The Treasure House. In fact, I'm off to read a bit more now...
That highlights a significant difference between what was envisioned back then and the ideas in circulation now. It’s not progress which interests people, it’s money; and one little one-kilometre metallic asteroid contains enough valuable metals (the nickel content especially) to pay for the combined, post-financial-crisis national debts of the EU and the USA.
January Recap:
Now.... please!
Morihei Ueshiba was a great martial artist and he is deserving of respect as the founder of Aikido. Pre- World War Aikido or Aiki Budo was much different than post war Aikido. During the pre- war stage we saw Ueshiba focused and dynamic. Post- War we saw an enlightened pacifist with a much different approach to Aikido. There are tens of thousands of Aikidoka throughout the world that follow Ueshiba’s post war Aikido and philosophies. Aikido is still growing strong even after MMA and BJJ came to the forefront.
The full February moon rises
Bon anniversaire and happy birthday, liebe Helene!
I can still see the day that you came to me on the pinked desert
Desmond-"They threw me into a wood shack and blasted me with a massive amount of electromagnetism."
5. Read poetry. Buy a book of poetry and read it, daily, aloud. This is one of the most transformative acts you can engage in for your soul. The process of poetics short circuits the detailed monologues we have running at any given time in our heads. In destitute times we need poetry to hint at the traces of fugitive gods and hidden realities. Try reading Rilke, Mary Oliver, Pablo Neruda, The Psalms, William Blake, Hafiz, or Rumi. These will keep you busy for a while.
The stage is left a bit bereft
I'm starting the journey. Yesterday was the first day of my new venture. I'm moving forward with the brewery.
Triple purple orach (May-June?).
The relevance for this blog: the pizza delivery scooters use the cycle lanes. Most scooters do, and since they have become very popular, they are now a hazard to cyclists. Scooters, not bikes, are the fastest-growing transport mode in Amsterdam, and the city is experimenting with scooter bans on cycle paths. The Dominos promotional video is shot entirely on cycle paths (Waterlooplein and Plantage Middenlaan).
It is hard to imagine that a well-established children's store in this child-friendly neighborhood couldn't make it. Even harder to imagine that the owner would not at least try to sell off the rest of the stock.
but there is work to be done...i'm on a roll...and then there is dog maintenance...today i don't mind...but tomorrow, with predicted rain, may be another story...still, she is becoming my very sweetest of companions...she turned one last week...they grow up so fast...
There was a sound that emanated from her kitchen. A sound of laughter amid cooking noises. It was a common custom for the women of the family to gather in the kitchen, where Mamaw was ever working. Canning beans in the summer, dressing hog meat in the fall, making elaborate family meals in the winter, and coloring Easter eggs in the spring. There were occasional comments about aches and pains from an overworked body, but I never heard complaints about all this work of food preparation and canning and preserving. But plentiful laughter reigned in that room. It was the meeting place for the family. It was where guests were entertained, ranging from family to preachers, to farm hands, to strangers. I have even seen the boot legger sitting there, talking over cattle prices with Papaw while Mamaw cooked the day’s rations. Conversations were punctuated with Mamaw’s comforting cackle.
4 sperm
The traditional Icelandic carol, "Jolakoetturinn" ("The Christmas Cat"), is Björk's contribution to the difficult-to-pronounce "Hvitt Er I Borg Og Bae" Christmas compilation, issued on the equally challenging Hljoeaklettur label in 1988.
Following are excerpts from an interview with Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi, which aired on Al-Jazeera TV on August 31, 2006.
As I pondered the enormity of today, I suddenly see this woman s portal of watery energy in the sky emit a tremendous amount of electrical bolts downward to her wispy vortex and her ladder. Obviously, all of her life! ALL of our lives!!
Just the idea of those stodgy old justices having to utter the words "bong hits" in the hallowed halls of the Supreme Court makes me smile.
